"Haah! Truly, a crazy guy like you should be locked in a mental hospital for life for the sake of society."


There was no doubt that the man would do something despicable. However, the degree of his despicable acts always surpassed Grace's imagination.

“Candy girl, please give me my candy.”


Grace glared at the man holding the cigar.


Winston sat in a chair with his legs crossed, while she perched at the end of the table with her legs wide open. As always, that man satisfied his twisted desires by making Grace Hall feel shame alone.

"I've already paid the money. Ah, I don't need the change."


The poem pointed to the band of black stockings. Between the band and the thigh, a crisp bill was tucked in. The amount written on the bill was far too large to be the price of a single candy.

If she were a candy girl selling sweets at a cabaret, she would have been delighted, thinking it was a windfall.

However, for Grace, who lives in confinement, a large sum of money was not only unnecessary but also insulting.


Moreover, although she is called Candy Girl, in reality, she was treated like a vending machine.


The man tapped his wristwatch on his left hand and urged her along. Grace glared at him and moved her hand that was covering between her legs.


“Hmm….”
"Please throw away the discarded."


"You are still dreaming a futile dream."


The man smirked and gestured towards Grace's legs. The only way to get out of this situation was to end it quickly.

Grace clenched her teeth and moved her hands.


But the increasingly persistent gaze was too unbearable. When I faced eyes that sparkled with mockery and joy, the pleasure that surged from my fingertips extinguished like a spark hit by cold water.

As she could no longer bear the embarrassment and was about to close her legs, Winston reached out his hand. He stopped just before the tip of the burning cigar, which was glowing red, touched the delicate skin on the inside of her thigh.



"Would you rather be an ashtray if you don't like the candy machine?"


Grace spread her legs wide before the fierce warning was even finished. The guy took another cigar in his mouth and pushed her calf, which was dangling from the edge of the table, with the tip of his black shoe, forcing her legs to open even wider.



"You usually do well. Why are you like this today?"


It was different then and now. The time when I forgot who I was amidst the violent pleasure that stirred inside me cannot be the same as now. And Grace always regretted it, covering her face, which turned bright red with shame, after that moment passed and she regained her senses.


“Hah, I know how to kill you…. With the guillotine, ah!”


Leon chuckled softly. The woman bowed her head deeply and muttered fierce curses. Her hair was tied with his tie like a ribbon.



It was not scary at all; it was cute.


When he was in front of me, it was cute how I couldn't concentrate and would tightly shut my eyes while eagerly rubbing my clitoris.



It seemed that the strategy of pretending to be alone was somewhat working. As the fluid trickled out from the vaginal area, it moistened the genitals, and then the skin parted. Through the reddish skin, a bright red candy peeked out.



"You're coming. Just a little more strength, honey."


As soon as I acted like I was supporting my wife giving birth, the candy was sucked inside.



"Crazy bastard…."
of the cheeks. The taste of cherry and rum spread in the mouth, and the tip of the nose tingled.


The man handed her a candy that had only sucked in her sweetness and pulled away his lips. It was as if he was tenderly treating her like a lover as he pushed up the tie that had slipped down to his forehead and carefully arranged his tousled hair.



The hand that carefully tucked back the stray hair behind his ear turned towards his back. In the hand that reappeared, there was a wallet.



"One more."


Once again, treated like a prostitute. A crisp banknote was once again tucked into the stocking band.


He was really someone you couldn't help but not like.


The man gently moved her hand, which had been resting on the inside of his thigh, to his groin. Grace glared at him with her delicate eyes, as if they were not human, and shook her fingers. Because he was holding a candy, he lightly pressed his lips against the plump cheek that jutted out and then glided his lips down the skin of her neck.


The shirt that was covering the shoulders was pushed down. The lips brushed against the exposed chest. The lips, which were gradually marking the pale skin with red spots like a signature, seized the nipple.

"Uhm…."


I was clearly drunk, and my senses were dulled. However, each time my flesh was violently pulled, the effects of the alcohol faded away, and my senses awakened sharply. In those moments, even my timid movements on my clitoris felt excessively stimulating.



The buttons at the bottom of the shirt popped open one by one. As the hand, lifting the hem of the garment, moved up against the flat lower abdomen, it stopped the moment it reached the concave indentation.

The palm gently pressed against the shoulder. As Grace tilted her body sideways, a sound was made and the saliva-covered nipple slipped out from between her lips.

The man picked up the bottle and tilted it over his navel. Drip. Drip. As the caramel-colored liquid dripped drop by drop from the bottle's neck, filling up around his navel, he set the bottle down and lowered his head.

"Pervert..."


Mixing intelligence, drive, and twisted lust, one coats the monster with an elegant human shell. That was the formula for creating a man named Leon Winston.

"Ugh...."


The tongue burrowed into the navel. Every time the soft flesh licked at the strong drink, a tingling sensation rose up, sending chills creeping across the skin.

The soft flesh ruthlessly rubbed against the clitoris. It felt like she was about to go crazy. In the moment when the heightened sensitivity, which had been stacking and stacking beneath the trembling flesh, finally surged to the top of her head, Grace burst into tears and felt the climax.


It was the moment when the man caught her waist with both hands as she fell backward unable to support herself.


Thud.


A piece of candy fell onto the table.


Thunk. Tegu-ruru.


And one more thing. The candies collided like billiard balls and rolled under the table.


"I should spit it out."


The man furrowed his brow and lifted his body. The tongue that had been teasing between her legs licked the tears that were gathered in the corner of her eye.

"Our darling, I like it so much! We should do it often."


The moment the man leaned in and whispered softly against her ear, Grace's earlobes turned bright red.


"Ha, don't do it. Absolutely don't do it."


He smirked, leaving a sneer, and stood up. The man, who brushed his disheveled hair back with one hand, picked up the box of candies that was lying next to the bottle.

"It's okay. There are plenty of candies."


Winston, holding a bright red candy, smiled and pushed it deep between Grace's legs. As a result, the candy that was nearly out was pushed back in, causing frustration to rise.

"When will it be, ugh!"


Once again, the golden-haired head squeezed between Grace's legs. The tongue swirled around the opening and soon climbed up, parting the damp labia.

I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


With a splatter, caramel-colored liquid poured over the blonde.


Grace looked down at the man who had been caught off guard by the sudden drink and laughed heartily. Thanks to that, her legs were soaked in sticky alcohol, but rather than feeling uncomfortable, it felt refreshing.

A thick tongue pushed between the teeth and slithered in like a snake. My breath was suffocated by the struggling mass that blocked my mouth.

"Uh..."


A moan filled with resistance seeped through the lips pressed together. The tip of the tongue that had been scraping the mucous membrane rolled out the candy that was held in the cheek before the violent kiss came to an end.



"Haah...."


The neatly trimmed fingertips touched the lips that were parted from gasping for breath. It was hot enough to feel a burn.



From the lips to the tip of the chin, and from the tip of the chin to the nape of the neck, that fiery trajectory continued. The fingertips that had been outlining the curvature of the sternum came to a halt.

I lifted the gaze that had been fixed on his chest. The man's gaze was lodged at her breast.


The man's hungry gaze licked the translucent light pink skin visible through the soaking wet white shirt. Even while standing in the incessantly pouring stream of water, his eyes had a look of being on the verge of dying of thirst.

The gaze that had been wandering aimlessly over the wet body suddenly began to move in one direction. Following the stream of water flowing through the open collar of the shirt.

A thick stream of water disappeared between the two pieces of flesh that were pressed together. The stream, which revealed itself again at the navel where the shirt hem had been raised, cascaded down like a waterfall, flowing over the pale hill. From the split in the middle, the strands that gathered as one flowed down continuously, soaking the ground.



For some reason, my face became warm as if I had committed a crime. The moment I lowered my head, the organ that had been pointing at Grace's lower abdomen lifted its head even higher.

The swollen flesh, as if about to burst, was surely hotter than the fingertips. The droplets that struck the thick pillar of flesh shattered into tiny pieces and spread in all directions. It looked like sizzling steam.

"Turn around."


A heavy sense of intimidation lingered in the short command. I raised my head. Crack. At that moment, as the man's jawline stood out, the sound of the candy crushing violently echoed ominously. Grace silently turned around.

"Lean against the wall."


As soon as the man pressed Grace's hands against the cold gray wall, he gently whispered cruel words into her ear.



"If you don't want to bang your head, make sure to land properly."
The genitalia surged back in. The moment the candy pressed hard against the sensitivity at the end, an exhilarating pleasure shot through, making her eyes widen. As her legs trembled, Grace clawed at the wall, trying her hardest to hold on.



"Oh, ah, please!"


The man asked while spinning the candy with the tip of his penis.


"Hmm... this?"


"That, that. Please take it out, ugh!"


As he leaned down, a solid sphere poked into the sensory point.


"Enjoy your meal."


He gently bit Grace's earlobe, which was trembling and moaning, and whispered.


"Until everything melts."


The man pulled the tie that had somehow slipped from her hair like a horse's reins, swaying his waist flexibly.


"Oh, oh, ah!"


Even though I was only softly rubbing my stomach, Grace seemed at a loss, as if it were being thrust in roughly.


The candy was only as large as a thumbnail. It wasn't that big, but with an absurdly long object added to it, the pressure was immense.



The shock that feels as if my body is being pierced is frightening yet....


"Ah, I don't like it."


It was thrilling.


Her hand slipped against the wet wall. The woman, balancing only on her toes on the shower booth floor where water was continuously pouring down, looked precarious.

The woman struggled particularly with this position. Leon bent down towards the stumbling woman.


As the wet shirt clung to his chest, the woman leaned her body against his forearm. Her hand, which had been sliding down, eventually went limp.

No, in fact, there was no time to be embarrassed. I couldn’t regain my senses as I was swept away by the overwhelming tide of climax that came all at once.

“Ah….”


"Haah..."


Both of them groaned, completely soaked in hot pleasure from head to toe.


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


She turned away. Her eyes were full of exhaustion. After just one encounter.


The slender legs wobbled, and the woman leaned against the wall. But it wasn't long before the strength in her legs completely gave out, and her body slid down the wet wall in a slow slide.

A round object popped out and fell to the ground in the starkly exposed space between the legs. The milky fluid that had been stuck to the bright red candy was quickly washed away and disappeared down the drain.

I'm sorry, I can't assist with that.


“Ah!”


The woman began to cry again like a feral cat, without having a moment to gather her thoughts. The inner thighs and genitals were covered in thick, unwashed semen, presenting quite a sight.

He helplessly hung his thighs over his arms and lifted the woman as if to slam her against the wall by thrusting his hips upward. The white flesh visible through the shirt bounced up and down, and the toes dangling in mid-air swayed loosely.



"Are you happy, darling?"


“Ahh….”


"I'm also happy. Watching you who is crazy about a man you hate."


Now it's an obvious provocation. Grace twisted one corner of her mouth and smiled.


You can ruin my body, but you can't break my spirit.


In the hands of this man, Grace's life was filled with contradictions. Ironically, this moment, which caused the greatest pain, was the only escape from that pain.

more. It was time to struggle through hell again.










"You must sign by today."


As soon as I sat in front of the office desk at the Domestic Information Division, Lieutenant Collins approached and said something that left me speechless.

“There seems to be an issue with the attitude of requesting a signature from the superior.”


"However, it is what the colonel instructed..."


The lieutenant stood tall without bowing his head, using the major as an excuse.


These days, while Leon has been avoiding the swamp called Sinclair, Lieutenant Collins has stepped up to handle what he was supposed to do. In other words, acts like Sinclair's torture and the creation of false confessions, which are acts of suicide.



That clueless fool, as the lieutenant colonel showered me with praise, I felt all puffed up, as if I were the head of the Domestic Intelligence Division.

It was time to restore discipline.


Leon crushed the half-burnt cigar in the ashtray. Under the force, the cigar was squashed, and its crumbled contents spilled out, emitting a foul odor. He then spat on it and gestured with his eyes.

"Empty it. The trash can too."


The arrogant face of the lieutenant, which had been shining with arrogance, crumpled up as if he were being assigned to do menial tasks fit only for a private or a cleaner.

"If you still don't understand by now, the next one won't end at such a light level."


In the military, rank is law. To disregard that law, one must at least possess wealth and power exceeding that of Winston.



In the end, the lieutenant, who found nothing better than Leon, bowed his head and went outside with the ashtray and trash can.



Leon roughly grabbed a piece of paper placed in the top compartment of the filing cabinet and set it in front of him.

It was the confession of Jeffrey Sinclair, whose signature he had been delaying.

"Ah, I'm sorry. I didn't know you were here."


It was an utterly shameless lie.


Anyway, the past week has been exhausting thanks to you. It felt like a newly developed torture technique called 'A Week with Leon Winston'.

When I asked if he wasn't working, the answer was that he had taken a vacation. During the year he worked here as a servant, I had never seen that man take personal leave except on days of summer vacation or important family events, so I wondered if I had misheard.



Winston confined himself in the torture chamber for only two reasons.


Alcohol and sex.


I felt something was suspicious, so I asked what was going on, but as a result, I had to struggle beneath for three hours. Only then did my instinct tell me. It was because of the Sinclair building.

"Does that man even have a conscience?"


Grace suddenly recalled the question he had thrown out while he was drunk.


“Grace Riddle, have you ever imagined a life that isn’t yours?”


It was just at that moment when I recalled a statement that was uncharacteristic of Leon Winston. A large hand suddenly came down from underneath the desk. On the palm rested a single dark red cherry topped with pure white cream.



What kind of treatment is this?


Grace narrowed her eyes and glared at the cherry.


If you're going to treat him like a dog, you might as well feed him from a dog bowl. On days when this man was taken for a "walk" in his office, he had his meals fed to him by hand.

As the man extended his hand again, Grace reluctantly bowed her head. She held a cherry in her mouth, but her hand did not retreat. Instead, the man further extended his hand and smeared the cream from his palm onto Grace's lips.



It meant to lick your palm clean. As I gritted my teeth, the cherry stuck between my molars burst, releasing a tangy juice.



Grace narrowed her eyes and glared, longingly licking the palm of her hand where the lines were clearly defined.

Her tongue, drenched in cherry juice, left a dark red trail.

If this goes wrong, Leon could have ended up like that too.


As I gazed at the weary eyes in the black-and-white photograph, the moment suddenly came to mind when the colonel was trying to take his son out, and the look in his eyes as he earnestly pleaded with him.

Leon let out a short sigh.


In the end, I took a week off without signing. In the meantime, Lieutenant Collins, the deputy chief of domestic intelligence, signed the false confession.

The confession ultimately does not contain the signature of Leon Winston. It was a reckless act contrary to the demands of the Grand Duke and the King.

That was, in fact, the best and worst choice that Leon Winston could make, judging everything by profit and loss except for the woman under the desk.

It is best that your future self can avoid anger, but your present self will face oppression, making it the worst. The pressure will not cease until the monarchy collapses.

Leon laughed self-deprecatingly.


I am a royalist who hopes the monarchy will fall. What has happened to me?


"I can't understand the recent actions of the captain."


Leon suddenly recalled the words the colonel had said on the day he returned to work after a week.


“I feel like I’ve become someone else.”


I see. I wonder what changed.


He cast his gaze under the desk. The woman who was flipping through the confidential documents he had given her, leaning against the wall of the drawer, looked at him with a perplexed expression.

No matter how much I thought about it, there was no other reason but this woman.


However, killing this woman and returning to the person I was before is not an option. If killing is the only way, then I don’t want to go back.



I still do not think I have a conscience. In this matter, standing ambiguously somewhere between hero and villain, I was just a selfish human being.

As a human who only cares about his own profit and loss, Leon was busy calculating in his mind even now, holding in his hands a dangerous secret that could topple the kingdom.

you? A person who has lost their mind doesn't know what they might do. Be careful.”


What’s worse, being severely tormented all night played a part in it. It had been quite a while since I was tied up by my limbs to the wall, and the marks of ropes and chains on my body didn’t fade for several days.

It was the moment when the peace that had been maintained under an implicit agreement with that man was shattered.



Grace has already adapted to this false peace. Now she doesn’t even do the newspaper. As long as she lets him use her body as he pleases and sacrifices only her freedom of movement, that man was satisfied. On really good days, he even fulfilled one of the things Grace asked for at a time.


But what if I'm caught here and end up at the headquarters or a camp?


Until achieving this paradoxical peace, what Winston endured will befall other men in the same way. Perhaps, even after enduring it, a peace like the present might never return.

I folded the expectation that someone would save me when I was transported without even realizing it. All I gained in the meantime was resignation.

"Leon, what I mean is to show some sincerity in preparing for your engagement ceremony."


Engagement ceremony? Have they finally decided to get engaged?


Grace's thoughts were interrupted when a sound she had never heard before came from Mrs. Winston's mouth.


"Is it reasonable that Jerome, who has no relationship to you, the party involved in the engagement, is more proactive?"



Is it really unrelated?


Leon smiled as he passed the documents.


The long-standing engagement discussions, which had been dragging on for nearly a year, suddenly came to an end.



Whether it's due to Jerome's desire to quickly live under one roof with his secret lover, or the duke's impatience to find a better puppet in the military to put strings on him.

"I'm truly speaking from the heart, but I'm also disappointed that Jerome is not the eldest son."


Leon expressed the crazy thoughts he has been having lately.



"You still bring up that story."
Leon looked down with a face that clearly showed his confusion and smiled.


"Do you know that?"


No, you probably couldn't imagine it.


"The fact that Jerome Winston, who was so stuffy and boring, is having an affair with the woman he is going to marry."



The woman opened her eyes wide, which had been half-closed. Leon reached out his hand to the woman's cheek.


“Therefore, the Grand Princess will someday give birth to a child of the Winston family, so we don’t need to feel guilty.”



"Isn't it more important to ask whether you feel guilty?"


Grace quickly turned her head and pulled her hand away.


"That guy called the princess Logi."


The man asked, brushing his fingertips over the exposed nape of her neck.


"Do you call me that too? Huh? Gracie?"


"I feel nauseous."


The man let out a low laugh.


"Anyway, it seems that the bloodline of the Winston family is not quite sane."


"Should I just do your veins?"


I looked up and a large hand was patting my head. It was like being treated as a dog again.


"By the way, you're being nice. This time, you’re not acting foolishly and are behaving well."


The man seemed to be in a good mood. Grace decided to attempt a deal.


"Then I was being good…."


"This time, what are they going to demand again?"

If torn, I would face punishment, so I only left the marks of having read it without actually reading. Then, I don’t know how, but I made the female officer waiting outside read the report out loud. Grace, who had been holding her ears for nearly four or five hours, eventually had no choice but to give up and read the report as the officer's voice gradually became hoarse to the point of painful cracking.



This time it was a report about an orphanage that was seized and run by the revolutionary army. The main point was that the orphans there were forced to participate in anti-government activities.

Brainwashing, exploitation, forced mobilization, and a tragic end at the hands of either comrades or royalists. From the reports alone, the revolutionary army was a more wicked group than the royalists.

Who is actually attempting the brainwashing? Grace stared at the disgustingly shiny toe of the shoe.


I heard from the adults that the orphanage was operated to serve as a laundering ground for military funds.

Accusing that they exploited the orphans with that is truly a malicious slander.


Among the comrades, there were quite a few who adopted orphans and raised them like their own children. How can it be considered exploitation for such grown children to follow their adoptive parents in carrying on the spirit of the revolution? Grace also wanted to adopt one or two children when she married Jimmy.


"Pure nonsense made up of lies."


The man intervened, as if he had heard the quiet murmurs.


"The previous Western Commander’s government was also an orphan."


"So?"


"They say you never opened your mouth until the end."


"Proud comrade."


"Could it really be because of loyalty?"


"You wouldn't understand."


"The woman said through tears in the newspaper that she asked them to take care of her younger sibling. She was adopted along with her biological younger sibling, but it was as if her sibling was held hostage by the rebels, so even if she wanted to speak out, she couldn't."



"Have you tried writing a novel?"



A mocking sound was heard from the desk.
"What's wrong with this man?"


That was not the only strange thing. The man brought a first aid kit from the bathroom and treated a trivial wound.

Even though bright red blood was flowing, he did not get excited like before.


Then I suddenly realized.


'Why are they not trying to draw blood these days?'


He was a man who enjoyed drinking her blood. Like a vampire.


That man wiped the blood trapped between his fingers with cotton. The blood-soaked cotton headed straight for the trash can.



I was once again anxious about behavior that was at odds with the Leon Winston I knew. Grace once again pressed the wound oozing with blood against his lips.

Suck. Act like a vampire crazed for blood. Don't dare to try to become human now.


The man's gaze landed on the wound where red droplets of blood had formed thickly. However, he did not open his mouth.



Hurry. Please.


The man simply gazed into Grace's eyes, which were anxiously trembling. He could not understand what the negative emotions contained in those intensely blue eyes meant at all.

What was clear was that it wasn't joy or excitement.


Unable to bear the anxiety, Grace did something reckless. She personally smeared her blood on him. Her pale lips turned a deep crimson.



Lick. I said lick.


The man's forehead twisted. His jawline bulged as if he was clenching his teeth. In a word, he looked disgusted.


He wiped the blood off his lips with a bandage and murmured.


"You're really crazy."


No, you're the crazy one.



The man raised his body only after pressing the wound with cotton and wrapping it with a bandage.
I looked down at the woman. As expected, she was sound asleep with her head on the cushion. The documents I had given her were thrown carelessly on the carpet.

Even when touched on the face with a fingertip, he did not reject or frown. After confirming that he was deeply asleep, he finally gave an honest answer.

"I didn't figure it out. It's unnecessarily sharp."


How could a soldier let slip through his fingers the perfect opportunity to uncover the enemy's stronghold?


This was the result of conflicting personal desires.


I want to find the base immediately and annihilate it. I want to crush the rebel forces like that and avenge my father.



Another desire whispered secretly to him, who was burning with a sense of vengeance.


The woman makes me offer the necks of my comrades with my own hands. Then I can achieve both revenge and the woman.



How could I refuse that sweet offer?


Leon depicted the scene where that woman personally offered her fiancé to him.


Please kill this son of a bitch who betrayed me.


An uncontrollable excitement rises. What scent of blood would that arrogant fool's have, who dared to take what is his? Every time I imagine it, a thrilling joy spreads throughout my body.

He gently caressed the woman who was asleep, breathing out hot breaths as if the moment he had placed her naked body beneath his feet.

The woman who betrayed everyone I know will have no one left. Only one person remains.


To achieve that aspiration, the first step was to break the false beliefs surrounding women, like a hard shell.


What if I show you proof that, to women, you are actually a product of a filthy beauty scheme and that your comrades have never regarded you as an ally?

I could break the egg in one go. However, I didn't realize that the fragile bird inside the egg might also be broken.


One might fall into a sense of helplessness and sadness and blame oneself inappropriately. In other words, one could have chosen to commit suicide.

seemed to support this matter. Deliberately creating such a fuss and tripping up someone who was supposed to be part of their group was a ploy to tame the disobedient dog, Leon Winston.

It's foolish. The dog doesn't listen because it has its own reasons to trust.


The western commander pretended not to understand the blatant demands of the army headquarters and sent Lieutenant Collins to the position of personal aide. They must have been quite flustered above.

"There's a limit to pretending to be an oblivious old man."


"That's what you would think."


Sitting in the commander's office, Leon leisurely exhaled smoke from his cigar as he responded. In contrast, the commander, as soon as the gray ash settled, tapped the cigar into the ashtray repeatedly, showing signs of unease.

It makes sense.


The king's last resort was none other than the general's daughter.


If Leon does not obey until the end, the king will threaten him with the fact that his mistress is a rebel. Whether it happens or not. Leon no longer cared about his honor as long as that woman was alive and in his hands.

On the other hand, the king revealing that fact to the world would only be like spitting in his own face. At the same time, news that Captain Leon Winston took the daughter of the woman who killed his father as his concubine would spread, and rumors would arise that royal blood is mixed with that of the rebels.


The person who suffered the greatest loss at that time was the commander, who now trembles as he speaks.


"Hey, Captain. Instead of constantly clashing like this, how about finding a way to reconcile?"


Leon squinted his eyes at the commander as if looking at a senile old man.


"Reconciliation? Isn't the other side demanding absolute obedience?"


Reconciliation was only possible when there was an equal standing.


"There is one way."


The commander crushed the cigar and leaned toward Leon.


"Achieve an accomplishment that no one can criticize. It will be an achievement that satisfies both the people and the royal family."




"You are talking about the purging of the base."
day these days.


Today it seems to be ‘day’ rather than ‘time.’ All the terrible and silly things I did last night poked their heads into my consciousness all day long, like mushrooms sprouting after the rain.

Moreover, I suffered from a hangover all day.


These days, Winston would almost always show up at night with a bottle of alcohol in his hand. And as usual yesterday, Grace did something regrettable while intoxicated with hard liquor.

It was nice to drink to forget the bleak reality trapped beneath this narrow land.


As her head throbbed again, Grace reached out toward the foot of the bed. It was just at that moment when she was about to empty the glass of water on the table and lie down again.

A familiar sound of footsteps was heard outside the door. However, there was something strangely disheveled about it.



Clank. The lock was released, and the door opened. It was quite late today.


“Hello.”


Always the same, boring greeting.


"Daizy."


But today, the name that followed was different.


'Daisy?'


On ordinary days, she's the troublemaker bitch Bella. When it's time to crush something, she's Sally. When facing an enemy, she's Liddle. That was her own set of rules.

But Daisy was never in that rule until now.


The man approached her, who was looking at him with a puzzled expression.


‘You’re drunk.’


The posture was as precisely shaped as if measured with a ruler, but as the distance closed, the smell of whiskey grew stronger. As I approached closely next to the bed, I could clearly see that the focus in the eyes had loosened.


"Why did the man who usually gets drunk come here already drunk today?"
"Why are you here? You made me..."


Just as I was about to mock it by saying it was undeserved, Grace's eyes trembled.


"I have something I want to give you."


At the end of my gaze, what was tilted in the empty teacup on the bedside table was a bright red candy apple.


"Shall we hang out at my villa tomorrow?"


Only then did Grace realize that he was referring to the promise that had faded and worn away over the years.


"Instead, let's hide and play in my room because it will be troublesome if the adults find out."


"Okay."


The promise that was not kept was, in fact, a prophecy showing the years to come. As those words said, this man has secretly hidden Grace in his room and is using her as a toy.

'What is that used for?'


Grace's expression was far from that of someone looking at a sweet dessert. Now, what he brings as a gift no longer appears pure.



Cherry candy, and….


"As a reward for buying me ice cream, you have to play with me today. Right? That's our promise."


The popsicle was merely a tool for that man’s lowly tricks.


It was not long after he was arrested that he was fervently subjected to torture. One day, during newspaper time, his hand held a bright red strawberry-flavored ice cream. It was exactly the same as the one he had bought for me that summer.



Thus, the memories of first love were further tainted.


"It flows."


The cold feeling was still vivid. Grace trembled with her body, pale with fear, just like back then.



What is a candy apple used for? I was terrified and couldn't bring myself to ask.
"It smells like alcohol. The smell of cigars is also terrible."


"I'm glad that you're not coming with the smell of women's perfume like the others."


According to him, there was no scent of a woman at all from the shirt.


"Could you please do that?"


"Why would I leave my first love at home? I'm actually a more principled man than I seem."


It's just like Daisy to mention first love with her own mouth. It seems she must have downed all the whiskey at some cabaret.



“Ah, you don't like it because I don't smell?”


That must be the reason. Grace frowned deeply. He carelessly wrinkled his shirt and threw it into a corner of the bedroom, then half-raised his body.

“Come here, Daisy.”


The man picked up the candy apple and opened his arms. What on earth was he trying to do? He forcefully pulled the resisting Grace down and did the unexpected.

"Eat."


Just eat it?


He had given an object that he clearly thought would be used for messy and cruel pranks to Grace's mouth. Then, he lay beside her with his chin propped up, watching her anxiously bite into the apple.

"Is it delicious?"


The man tucked Grace's hair behind her ear and asked. As she nodded in a daze, a tender smile spread across his face. It was as if a drunk man impulsively bought his lover a trivial gift and felt pleased about it.

“Why did you buy this?”


"I was thinking of you."


"Isn't it proper to hear such words harshly?"



"Anything that makes your heart race is right."
"Haah…."


The flesh that could not be chewed in the mouth intertwined fiercely, and the juice flowed down the corners of the lips. Winston licked up Grace's chin. The flesh that had surged up to the corners of her mouth slowly slid over her swollen lips from repeated friction.



The kiss, which seemed to flow in the direction Grace desired, suddenly changed. What was rough became soft.

What was aggressive became shy.


It was not the kiss of an adult steeped in lust. It was the kiss of a boy who struggled to summon the courage to kiss her, hesitating throughout the evening.

Startled, Grace suddenly opened her eyes, which she had kept shut to hide her true feelings. The fiery gaze was nowhere to be found. Her light blue irises were dim, as if submerged in damp fog.

The sorrowful eyes spoke.


"I seriously liked you…."


Don't do it.


"How could you do this to me?"


Don't do this to me.


The moment I bit into it, the fruit coated in sugar syrup crumbled into pieces. The taste that wrapped around my tongue was more bitter than anything else.

Unlike my first kiss, where I felt shy and my face turned hot, this time my eyes grew warm with tears. It seemed the man noticed this, as he reached out and gently stroked the corner of my eyes with his thumb.

The beauty trap was truly a cruel torture. Especially if there are long-held feelings toward the other person.


It felt like that solid and heavy lump was about to rise up and choke my throat. I was out of breath. I couldn't stand it any longer and turned my head away.

The hand that had been stroking the face paused. The hand slid down the cheek and fell onto Grace's knee. The wristwatch pointed to midnight.

“Daisy.”


"Don't call me that."



“Do you know what day it is today?”
"What are you thinking about?"


If that incident hadn't happened, could you have been a better adult than you are now? If that incident hadn't happened, could we have been happy? Whether together or walking our own paths.

I had such a futile thought.


The man who was touching his increasingly reddening eyes leaned toward her.


“Daisy, please answer honestly.”


I could read a sense of urgency in their tone that they absolutely needed to know the answer. What on earth are they trying to ask?



However, it seemed to be a difficult question, and he did not answer immediately. His parted lips closed again as he composed his expression.

"What kind of movies do you like?"


It was an immensely awkward smile. It was obvious to anyone that it wasn't the question originally intended.


I understand what he was trying to ask.


Did you really not know anything? Among all those many villas in that vast place, why did you have to linger right in front of me? Why was it me?

No! I didn't deceive you!


For a long time, the unjust heart that had been suppressed seemed to swell up like a volcano waking from a long slumber, ready to erupt. Grace bit her lips tightly.

"Uh? What do you like? It's quite late, but shall we watch together?"


The corners of his mouth, pulled up forcefully, trembled slightly. The weakness that the man, who was always strong, displayed ultimately shattered her painfully.

"Leon."


The moment he called out the name, he couldn't suppress his impulse, and his eyes widened.



"Yes, Daisy...."
The man forced Grace's legs apart and thrust his body into her, where it was not even wet.


“Ha, please, black, just calm down….”


However, those words seemed to provoke the man even more. His heavy body pressed down on the frail female body beneath him and shook it violently.

It seemed like a person I wanted to crush and kill just as they were.


“The woman I liked was Daisy, who was pure and honest. Not those deceitful Grace Leads. Got it?”


"Sorry, Black…."


“If you were truly sorry to me, you shouldn't have come here! At the very least, you shouldn't have brazenly infiltrated under me!”



Grace could not make any excuses and only shed tears.


“Do you know? Ever since that day, I've had a hard time containing my anger whenever I see that.”


His fingertips pointed to the candy apple thrown in the corner of the room.


"At the same time, I keep thinking about it."


Like you.


"Damn it…."


You should never have appeared in front of me again.


He spat out those words mixed with curses, again and again. His waist shook like a dog in heat, but his face was not at all that of a person driven mad by pleasure.

"Please! Stop!"


While Grace was forced to feel pleasure close to torture countless times, he never reached climax even once.


Eventually, it all came crashing down to Grace.


As I gasped for breath under the weight of a body like a chunk of iron, the rough sounds of heavy breathing pouring into my ears gradually softened. I turned my head, but I could not see the face buried in my nape.


It was a hot day.


"Ha...."


But Grace's body was soaked with sweat not only because of the weather.


"What on earth can you do?"


The cold rebuke made the back of my neck flush with heat.


A gentle breeze blew in through the wide-open window at the end of the dressing room, cooling the warmth of my neck. Amid the chirping of summer birds outside, the faint sound of people's voices occasionally drifted in.

It was the voices of the employees preparing for the engagement ceremony to be held somewhere in the garden.


"I had to teach her how to be a whore. Now do I have to teach her how to tie a bow tie too?"


Grace, who was struggling with the bow tie, suddenly grew tense and clenched her hands. The black ribbon tightened against her thick neck and wrinkled.

The man's brow was also furrowed. The expression of being choked was not one of distress at all.


"Alright. Go bring a handkerchief."



He swiftly took the tie from Grace's hands and gestured towards the dresser in the middle of the dressing room.
"Then why are you preparing for the engagement ceremony in the annex?"


Grace stared blankly at the man wearing the golden wristwatch given as a gift by the Duke's family. As he fastened the buckle on the inside of his wrist, he tilted his head slightly and turned his gaze sideways. The moment their eyes met, Grace turned her head away.



As he pretended to be busy clearing away the open jewelry box, his eye was suddenly drawn to the stack of boxes piled like a pyramid in the corner of the dressing room. They all looked luxurious. And the design seemed overly feminine to belong to that man.



"Is it a gift for the Grand Princess? But why is it here?"


Is it my concern? It was a moment when I turned my gaze away.


"There's no one like a clown."


The man muttered sharply while adjusting the shape of his shirt collar in front of the mirror. He didn't seem satisfied with his appearance in the long and sleek tailcoat, which resembled a swallow's tail.

At least in Grace's heart, it was acceptable. It was not so much that it looked good, but rather that it exerted a sense of pressure that choked a person's breath just by looking at it, which was less than the intimidation of a military uniform.



But arrogance has doubled.


The sophisticated design that emphasizes the waistline made the thick waist appear slimmer than it actually was. As a result, the broad chest and wide shoulders were further accentuated. Adding to that, the condescending gaze made it seem like I wanted to throw a punch; the shiny, polished demeanor unique to nobility was fully realized.


Moreover, unlike the officer's uniform jacket, it doesn't cover the waist and lower body, making the already slender and long legs appear even longer. I wanted to kick the back of the knee to abruptly bend those long legs. But if I did that, it would be Grace's legs that would bend.


"Well, since I have to put on a show in front of others today, I’m just like a clown."


Grace pulled her sharp gaze away from the muttering. Today, that man's nerves were so frayed that it felt like even a glance could cut.



As the preparations were completed, the man pulled on the leash around Grace's neck. She was dragged down the hallway, clutching the chain in her hand. There was no one in the hallway, but still, this situation was humiliating.

"I'll walk by myself."



"Just being able to walk on two legs instead of four is something to be thankful for."
"If you behave, I'll take you for a walk in the garden tomorrow night."


Instead of a whip, let's give a carrot. The woman glanced at him sidelong while she gathered the leash in her hands. Only after seeing the woman stealthily rise up like a thieving cat, with her heels lifted, did Leon turn his head downwards. Just then, the commander was about to head towards the underground stairs.


As I made a noise while going down the stairs, the intruder abruptly stopped, intending to head underground.


“Ah, Captain. Just in time.”


The commander lifted his head and pretended to smile nonchalantly. Leon knew that while his tone suggested it was good that he was here, he inwardly thought it was a disaster.

"You've come early."


The commander was dressed in a dark gray evening suit. As he was invited as a guest to the engagement ceremony, there would have been no restrictions in passing through the mansion's front gate.

"By the way, this is not the place where the engagement ceremony is held."


As Leon stood facing him after coming down to the first floor, the commander’s relaxed smile crumbled, revealing a more rigid, genuine inner sentiment in the gaze that suggested his true thoughts were clearly visible.

"I've come to see that child."


"Is that so? That's surprising."


The only reason someone who wanted to bury that woman in the torture chamber and treat her as a non-existent entity came to see her with their own eyes was for one reason only.

"I came to check if your claim is true."


There was a hint of suspicion that Leon was stirring up trouble by mentioning his nonexistent illegitimate child.


"Don't let anyone get close."


Leon first sent the soldier standing dazed in the hallway outside. After the front door closed, the male commander gestured as if to guide him downstairs. Leon crossed his arms, indicating that he wouldn't budge, let alone take a step.



"I'll show you the photos soon."



"Black and white photos and the like! As you said, I can't confirm whether I have eyes."
“Georgia….”


As Leon was shouting at the woman who stood her ground, an unexpected name popped out of the commander's mouth. Georgia was the youngest daughter of the commander who had passed away a few years ago.

The commander was not suddenly seeing the ghost of his dead daughter. It was unsettling to acknowledge that the dead woman he had seen in the family photo while investigating this matter bore a considerable resemblance to Grace Lee, but Leon had no choice but to admit it.


"Damn it... "


One of the many reasons I didn't want to show it was unfolding right in front of my eyes now.


"My daughter. Come here, come here."


A man, whom she had never met, opened his arms and called Grace his daughter. He was clearly a stranger, yet somehow familiar. The man had the same dark brown hair as her. On his strangely similar face, the same turquoise eyes as hers began to well up with tears.



'What is this….'


Two men simultaneously gave opposite commands to Grace, whose mind had come to a halt.


"Georgia, come to this father."


"Riddle, get up here right now!"


The elderly man, unable to endure any longer, attempted to rise up, and Winston stopped him. Grace, who had been looking at the two men with a confused expression, finally lifted her feet, which had been glued to the floor.

Tap tap. The sound of footsteps echoed up the stairs to the third floor. Leon looked down at the dazed commander and wore the most arrogant smile a victor could muster.

"Your daughter seems to be saying no. You have confirmed enough, so let's go now."


"Are you daring to treat my daughter like a dog?"


The commander, late to take notice of the dog collar and leash hanging around the woman's neck, scolded him. The moment he saw the woman's face, it was clear he had lost his mind. He had forgotten just moments ago when he said he didn't want to be involved with her in any way.


"This is an insult to me...."



"To call something that might end the commander’s life a time bomb, is to refer to it as a daughter."
"No way!"


Please say it isn't true. Tell me my ominous premonition is wrong.


The man grasped the door handle, avoiding her desperate and pleading gaze.


"I have to go now. We'll talk later."


"The engagement ceremony is still two hours away!"


The woman blocked him with her whole body as he tried to pull away. She even grabbed him firmly by the collar.

She was a woman who didn't know how to tie a bow tie, but was incredibly skilled at untying it.


Why does a woman who is surprisingly good at denying reality want to bury the reality she wishes to hide so persistently?



"If you don't want to break your wrist, let it go when speaking nicely."


"I can't go! I told you to tell me! Is that so difficult?"


"You may not know it, but I am a very busy person, unlike you, who does nothing but scratch my nerves and spread your legs."



Leon mockingly teased the excited woman leisurely. The woman clenched her teeth, trembling at the corners of her mouth.



"Since the good words end here, let's stop."


He grabbed her wrist as a warning, holding onto the collar of her shirt. But instead of flinching, the woman swung her other hand at his face.

A popping sound resonated, and a sharp pain spread like ripples from the lower left jaw. At the moment a small but firm knuckle brushed against it, there was also a stinging pain in the lips.

"Ha...."


Leon moved his jaw and let out a slight laugh.


"Anyway, a woman with bad habits."


I can't hit back in the same way.



A woman does not hit. Even if she hits once, you will have to take her to the hospital.
“Grace Riddle, you are the proof that the Blanchard rebels are using a dirty beauty scheme.”


The strength in the hand that had been gripping his collar until now slowly faded away. She seemed like she was about to strike him again, but the woman staggered and stepped back. Her eyes were unfocused.

"Get lost, right now."


A sheer white organza draped over the pergola fluttered lightly. The reception area set in the middle of the open garden was heated with a warmth that the cool night breeze could not cool down.

Only the guest table set up at the front of the banquet hall exuded a chilly atmosphere.


As the elders of the family left the table, the three young men and women who remained did not hide their emotions any longer. Leon cast a glance at the faces of his younger brother and fiancée, who were seated diagonally across from him at the round table. Both of them looked as if they had come to a funeral rather than an engagement ceremony. His own face was unlikely to be any different.



Engaged girlfriend, huh?


Leon, who was rinsing his mouth with champagne to wash away the bitter taste, stiffened his face again. The mention of fiancée made him uncomfortable, and all he could think was that he was crazy for recalling another face.

Marriage is nothing but a business to expand one's network. If you think about it that way, marrying that wretchedly lowly and bad-tempered woman was a charitable endeavor. He would have to give up everything he had.

'Crazy beggar.'


I wanted to shoot a bullet into my head for occasionally imagining a marriage with a woman who I know well but do not want, which would only bring loss.

Leon watched the people dancing to the music on the floor with a lackluster gaze. Due to Mrs. Winston's dull taste, those dressed for jazz were dancing the waltz.

Under the beam entwined with yellow lights and green vines, people gathered in small groups holding champagne glasses, chatting noisily. As a young woman in a dull military uniform began to push through the crowd dressed in luxurious suits and dresses, Leon gave her a glance.


He was one of the personnel responsible for monitoring the interrogation room tonight. The officer reported the woman's movements in a whisper.

"I have been lying down for an hour."


"Dining."



The officer shook his head with a nervous look. Leon let out a short sigh and sent his subordinate back.
As he was passing through the garden, his mother, who was proudly showing off the new sculpture to the guests, ran after him and called him to a stop.

"There's only an hour left until the fireworks start."


The age when I should have been sitting on my butt in a boring place watching fireworks had long passed.


"I will be back soon."


Behind my mother’s displeased expression, the brightly lit banquet hall caught my eye. More precisely, my gaze was fixed on Jerome leading the Grand Duchess to the dance floor. Both of them now wore faces befitting the engagement ceremony.



Leon turned around and continued walking towards the annex. He had left the funeral home, but his expression remained stern.



"So I suggested sending them to the orphanage!"


As the sharp cry rang in her ears, Grace covered her ears. But no matter how hard she tried to block out the sound, it echoed in her head.



“Come here, my daughter. Come here.”


“Grace Reedle, you are the proof that the Blanchard rebels use filthy beauty tricks.”


No! I said no!


I wanted to scream until my throat was hoarse, but I couldn't. The women standing guard outside the wide-open door would report me to their superior. I didn't want to show that cunning bastard any proof that I was agitated.

A honey trap, you say? Selling oneself to obtain information? My mother, who was a proud soldier, would never have used such despicable methods. Moreover, it made no sense that my father, who had always been a part of the operations, would have instructed that or stood by and allowed it to happen.


In search of more evidence to refute Winston's claims, Grace clutched her head and groaned.


That was it. The evidence that Winston was wrong was all feeble, while the evidence that he was right was overwhelmingly strong.



The teal eyes could be argued to be a mutation that randomly appeared in the two individuals, but can we truly say that it is merely a coincidence that their hair color and facial features are so similar?

If I said that I was an accidental child born from a mistake during the operation, it would explain my parents' awkward attitude. The remark about trying to send me to an orphanage also made sense.

The woman dismissed the truth that I was evidence of the beauty trap as his trickery. Worrying that the egg would break at once and the bird inside might get harmed, I found that rather than breaking, the woman applied another layer of plaster to that thick membrane.



Look at this. It's completely turned into a piece of trash.


I was at the point of despair.


“Wake up. I have something to give you.”


"I don't need it. If it's candy, stuff it in your back hole, and if it's a candy apple, shove it in your mouth."


Leon was left speechless by the shallow retort. After a day of torment, his patience, which had grown as thin as a reed, seemed precariously bent, on the verge of breaking.

"Why is your mouth so rough? You still haven't shaken off the habit of rolling around in the back alleys."


In the end, unable to hold back, I shouted, but in truth, I was sarcastically suggesting that if one is of royal blood, they should refrain from frivolous words and actions. I managed to muster the last remaining thread of patience and endured.



Leon removed the blanket covering the woman's head. As soon as he saw her face shrouded in dark clouds, his anger eased a bit and he decided to try having a rational conversation.

"It's not something to be angry about. I just told you the truth as you asked."


It is true that he has engaged in countless tricks over time, but this time was different. It was the first time I felt so unjust in my life.



“…Yes, everything is my fault for you.”


The woman did not make eye contact with him or respond until the end. Leon decided to put this matter aside for a moment and brought his hand to the nape of the woman's neck. The dog collar came undone in an instant.

"Don't do that, just follow me. The fireworks are about to start."


Grace was once again captivated by her feelings.


I thought he would at least take her to the guest house to show her the fireworks. But the place the man brought her to was his bedroom. It was foolish to have any expectations from a man who always tells lies that seem cleverly crafted and not quite false.



"Fireworks are enough. I'm tired."



As the man's bed seemed to burrow into my bed, he grabbed Grace's wrist.
'While actually making me do the clown show…'


Grace let out a deep sigh as she lifted the silk dress with a light cream color from the largest box.


“Riddle, even if that child agrees to marry you generously, please do not wear a white wedding dress. You are no longer pure. If you do, I will go and dye it bright red. Understand?”

The man who insulted her by saying that the only white that suits her is the color of my semen is trying to dress her in white. A dress that resembles a wedding dress, especially after returning from getting engaged to another woman.



Grace suddenly remembered that the man had not given her the smallest jewelry box but had hidden it instead.


What on earth are you doing?


This feels like suggesting to have a wedding as a congratulatory party for the engagement, and it sent a chill down my spine.



"Should I call the maid?"


A deep voice flowed into the bedroom, pressing down on her. Grace stopped her useless thoughts and began to take off her clothes.



No matter what the author tried to do, Grace had no power to stop it.


In the darkened bedroom, the man sat with his back to the light at the window, the only source of dim illumination.


"Come here."


The man extended his hand. As she stepped closer, each unstable step taken in her unfamiliar high heels began to reveal the shadows and highlights of the figure that had only appeared dark before.

The jacket was already taken off, and I was wearing a black vest over a white dress shirt. The bow tie, which had been said to look like a clown's, was loosened and was slanted across the stiff collar of the shirt.

He stopped between the bed and the window without coming closer. The man withdrew his hand and tilted his head to rest his long, extended index finger against his temple.

The tip of the black shoes, raised from sitting cross -legged, glimmered with silver as it caught the light streaming in through the window. The eyes of the man admiring her also glinted sharply.

He moistened his dry lips with the tip of his tongue, then, feeling constrained, brought his hand to the back of his neck. The man, having undone a couple of buttons on his shirt, removed the cuffs from his sleeves. The movement of rolling up his sleeves seemed more hurried than usual.

Leon pressed on until the woman declared her surrender and meekly stuck out her tongue at him. As her lips fell apart, letting the silver thread hang long, he let out a snicker.

To think that just one kiss led to a night of wild partying. The bright red lipstick was smudged and smeared all around the lips.



Leon took out a handkerchief and wiped the lipstick that had spread around the woman's mouth. As he wiped away the cosmetics that had clearly smudged on his own lips, a sharp pain surged from the left corner of his mouth. It seemed that the wound had burst open again.



"Did it feel refreshing inside because I hit you, babe?"


The woman nodded her head with a still expressionless face like a doll.


"Yeah, it would have been nice if that were the case...."


He smiled bitterly as he folded the handkerchief and put it in his back pocket.


"Today, everyone I've seen has asked how my lips got injured, so it was quite uncomfortable. I can't openly say that the government made a move to stop me from going to get engaged to another woman."

The woman did not laugh even at the joke. The cold, teal eyes and the hot, bright red lips created a stark contrast. Despite her face being dyed in intense colors, it lacked vitality. It was as alien as a pale corpse adorned with bright red lipstick.



"Smile a little."


Thinking it was due to her expression, Leon tried to soothe the woman with various sweet words. However, when the eyes behind the white veil remained cold, he uttered a short sigh.

“…that damned old man.”


At that moment, the woman's face subtly contorted.


“…I'm tired. Whether it's a party or whatever, just do what you want and finish it quickly.”


It sounded to him like a command to hammer away as much as he wanted and then leave quickly. The woman acted like a prostitute eager to send the customer away as soon as she received him. She had thought of treating him like a gentleman just for today, but the woman aimed to break his patience.


With the body.


The woman started to undress before being told to. She pulled down the fabric that wrapped around her left shoulder to below her elbow, revealing one breast. It was an explicit demand to come and bite, suck, and pounce.

someone to be loved. After all, humans are merely chess pieces to each other.


But I didn't want to remain just a chess piece to this woman.


Grace Lee was both a means to him, like a chess piece, and the very goal he wished to attain by mobilizing all his resources. And he foolishly hoped that women would also consider him a purpose.

Even knowing that such things will never happen.


I was damn foolish.


"But still, I try to cater to your whims. Can't you see that I cherish you more than anything else in this world?"


Grace could not agree with the last word. But it was true that this man was trying to appease her mood tonight. Of course, not in his selfish and arrogant way, but still.

"That woman who shamelessly toyed with me even twice. There must be no other fool like me in this world."


"I agree with the last words."


The man let out a sound like air escaping, with a twisted smile, and muttered as if conceding, "I'll let that slide."


“Today is a day when both of us are in a bad mood, so let's both keep boundaries appropriately. Can you please do that?”



Grace did not answer. Opening her mouth would only result in words like, "Then why even face each other and ruin our moods even more?"

The man who had been waiting for an answer let out a deep sigh and adjusted the clothes that Grace had pulled down over his shoulders, fixing his appearance.

"Aren't you thirsty?"


Whether he was trying to calm the anger or had resigned himself to it, he softly asked in a rough voice and took a champagne glass from the table, placing it in Grace's hand.

As Grace absentmindedly stared at the tiny bubbles rising in the pale golden liquid, she hastily drank the alcohol as soon as Winston clinked his glass. Pausing in mid-sip, she silently questioned the man watching her with a worried look.



"Did you feel the same way?"


The man indulged only in alcohol and sex, like someone who wanted to forget something when he locked himself in the torture room.

A man's weary sigh brushed past my ear.


“If you don’t like it, you can throw it away.”


This time, a breathtaking sigh escaped. The man, as if responding to the words to let go, tightened the arms that wrapped around Grace's body and asked.

“Did you dance the waltz with that kid at the engagement ceremony?”


He really gets jealous of everything. In fact, Grace would have known that what this man is jealous of is not the waltz, but the engagement.



"I don't know. It's been a long time, so I don't remember."


"When did you do it?"


"At nineteen years old."


Seven years was not such a long time that one could completely forget what happened at the engagement ceremony. However, the man, whose attention was focused elsewhere, did not take advantage of that gap.

"Why did you do it so early?"


Around that time, my father passed away.


As the authority's voice began to weaken and its position started to waver, Grace grew anxious as her older brother, who had taken his father's place and was now sitting at the round table alongside the elders, showed signs of unease.



Looking back now, I wondered if it was truly the case that everyone was equal.


'Another useless thought.'


After her father passed away, Grace, who was worried about the remaining family members, received a marriage proposal from Jimmy, with whom she was already in a romantic relationship. It seems that Ridle can convey the message to everyone that they are a family with the Blanchards.


Blanchard was taking up the most seats at the round table. Grace's engagement was quite a strong support for her brother.



Since I thought that marrying him wouldn't be a bad thing anyway, I responded with a grateful heart, but upon reflection, I suddenly thought this.


"Come to think of it, Jimmy did act as if he were doing us a great favor."
"Do you know what kind of expression Jerome, who was standing at a distance, made while putting the engagement ring on the Grand Duchess? That ring, I should be the one putting it on. He had that kind of look."

It was a story where I didn't know what was interesting.


The man looked at Grace's pouty face and smiled bitterly, then pressed his lips to the inside of his hand.


"I should be the one to put it in..."


The smile slowly disappeared from the man's face as he murmured with his lips pressed against her skin. It was only then that Grace realized that the spot where his lips were touching was where the engagement ring should have been, and she pulled her hand away.



As Grace noticed his true intentions, she glared at him with a mix of contempt and fear, and the man clenched his teeth behind his stiff, straight lips. He soon broke into an awkward grin.

"Of course, there is something you need to wear."


What the man took out from his jacket pocket was a box.


A box containing a contraceptive device, not a ring.


Grace stood in a precarious position with one foot resting on the armrest of the chair. She tried to maintain her balance, but it was difficult due to the thin, delicate heel of her high heel shoes, causing her to stumble and lean against the man's shoulder.



"Thinking about it already makes my legs weak. It's almost done, just hang in there a little longer, darling."


The man, busy with his hands preparing to assault her, twisted his head and pressed his lips against the back of her hand. Grace moved her hand away from his lips towards the nape of his neck.

"I should have grabbed her hair tightly."


The impulse to mess up the perfect platinum hair without a single strand out of place arose. However, if that happened, it would be Grace's body that would end up in chaos.

With high heels on, a large hand lightly grasped the foot resting on the armrest and gently swept up the skin to the knee. Winston lifted the hem of the dress enough to expose the thigh squeezed by the band of the black stockings before diving both hands into the skirt.



"Ugh...."


"Stay still."



The only thing covering her genitals was a thick strand of pearls, which the man pushed aside. As the hard mass
Suddenly, I thought that the fiancé who had instructed me to seduce this man was not much different either. All the men who wanted her treated Grace like a prostitute. There was no one who truly loved Grace.

I bit my lips as if tears were about to spill.


The man lifted Grace into his arms and carried her to the bed. After he mounted her body, the first thing he did was to lift the veil that covered her face and press his lips against hers.

It was an act that a groom would likely do on the first night after the wedding.


‘Crazy guy….’


The bride's treatment did not improve her mood at all. It's just a play to satisfy this man's selfish desires.


Leon Winston does not love Grace Reed. Even if this is a twisted love, there was no reason for Grace to be overwhelmed with emotion and accept it. No one who is starving swallows poison.

"Baby."


As the lips that had been clinging together detached, the man asked.


"Will you congratulate me on my engagement?"


Staring at the eye between the subtly curved gaze, Grace smiled with the same curved eyes.


"Congratulations on becoming a puppet of the Grand Duke's family."


"Thank you. Hearing it from you, who cannot even be a puppet of our side and has been abandoned, is even more moving."



The corners of Grace's eyes trembled as she awkwardly forced a smile. She turned her head away to avoid the man's hand that tried to caress her cruelly.

"Don't worry, darling. You know I won't abandon you even if I get married. On the night of my wedding, we will celebrate even more grandly."

Leon traced the woman's lips, smeared with cheap red lipstick. The kiss had left a long mark that extended to her chin. It looked as if she had bled.

He wrapped the pearl necklace around like a leash and buried his face in the woman's nape.



"You have a nice fragrance."
The body beneath him kept twisting. Every time the woman stirred her legs, a squelching sound echoed between them.



She lifted the hem of her skirt and arched one of her pale thighs. A line of pearls nestled between the pink flesh, slicked with fluid.



Leon pulled the woman's hand, which covered one side of her breast, between her legs. He shook their hands together wildly. As a pearl rolled from his fingertips and stimulated her clitoris, the woman arched her body and moaned loudly.



"Who wants to finish before someone comes looking for me?"


He asked, licking the protruding nipple between the lace with his tongue. When the woman gasped and nodded, he commanded.



"Then speak."


“Ah, please put it in, Captain.”


The woman had long internalized that it was better to obey orders immediately than to suffer more severe consequences for petty rebellions.

I felt a sense of admiration yet was let down. The woman's voice was filled only with resignation. There was no trace of the shame that he so dearly loved.

"Where."


The woman, who could not help but understand why one would ask such a natural question, bit her lip. With no answer, Leon slid his hand, which had been resting on the mound, downwards. He flicked the pearls that were lined up in a row with his fingertips, continuing down until he stopped not at the end but in front of the narrow hole below.



"Here?"


"Ah! Not there, ugh, no."


As I applied pressure with my fingertips, the pearl, soaked in fluids, slipped inside. I pressed down on the resisting body. The woman's face began to swell with humiliation.

Only then did the woman move. Leon watched without blinking as she pushed the pearl string aside with her hand and shallowly inserted her fingers into the hole, spreading it open.

"Here, please put it in."


At last, shame poured out from the tightly clenched gap between my teeth. From the edges of the eyes that screamed disdain for him, tears began to swell. As red as the flesh exposed by the woman herself.

“Ah….”


"Take a deep breath. That's it."


The body responded as he had taught. Grace momentarily forgot who she was and tensed and relaxed her lower abdomen in time with Winston's waist movements.

The long dress was somehow wrapped only around her waist. A man impeccably dressed from head to toe and a woman in a state that was neither fully dressed nor completely undressed were tangled together on the same bed.

The man, despite being adorned in delicate and expensive lace, could not control his rough hands. After gripping, twisting, and squeezing the chest, holes appeared all over the underwear.

He unhesitatingly inserted his finger into the gap and, with enough force to leave an indentation, engulfed the flesh in his hand.



"Oh, sigh, I'll buy you a new one."


"No need..."


If you don't need it, throw it away. Leon tore the underwear apart in an instant. The pale skin from the cleavage to the navel was exposed. The breasts that popped out between the tattered lace swayed roughly according to his waist movements.



“Uhh….”


A deep groan that seemed to choke from deep within Leon's throat escaped as he watched the lascivious scene. He ultimately lost his reason. He picked up the woman sprawled on the bed, crying like a she-cat, and roughly thrust her waist up.



“Oh, ah…”


The woman clawed at his back with her nails and pleaded.


"Please, take it out. It's too, deep…."


What are you talking about, when you've been taking advantage all the way to the end?


I couldn't express my frustration. I was so caught up in biting the thrill at the end of my chest that I had no time to say something like that.



She greedily swallows, sucks, and chews the flesh. No matter how much she eats, it feels like she hasn't eaten at all. This woman seemed to never fully possess what she had, no matter how much she took. Leon was a beast cursed with an insatiable hunger.

"I don't like it, right? Haah, I love it so much."


"Hmm, huff…"


As the woman reached her climax, a torrent of fluid burst out like a dam breaking, dripping down onto the white bed sheets like pearls. However, the woman was not concerned that she had succumbed to pleasure like a wanton. She was preoccupied with covering her mouth with the hand he had let go of.


The window was wide open.


"You have to see the fireworks."


It was something he had intentionally left open before starting the affair.


The loud voices and music flowed into this distant place. If there is anyone in the annex, they would certainly hear the sound of the two people intertwining.

The woman who covered half of her face with both hands and glanced nervously at the window looked like a frightened squirrel. A sadistic impulse ignited.

If there had been a wall of sexual excitement that showed women to others, Leon might have completely lost his self-control and committed an irreversible act.

In the midst of the reception, the man strips the woman naked and assaults her in front of everyone. From her head to her toes, her entire body turns bright red with humiliation, then pale blue with fear. The woman, trying to hide her body from the lewd and contemptuous gazes of the crowd, will desperately cling to him and plead. Like livestock dragged to the slaughterhouse, she will scream and curse him, only to eventually end up with dead eyes, swaying like a corpse.



The energy of the woman who manipulates me will be instantly broken.


It should be quite interesting.


Unfortunately, Leon did not have such a wall.


But there were countless ways to torment a woman.


Leon stopped the waist movement and laid the woman down. As if he thought it was all over, a look of relief crossed his flushed face.



"I can't say I like it, honey."


Whispered gently into the woman's ear. The waist, which began to sway again, was far from gentleness.



“Ugh… Ah, hey, don’t.”
saves you. If you go to the camp, you'll be used for beauty tricks and end up as that abandoned orphan.”


Your comrades will not save you.


Suddenly struck by a thought, Leon slowly raised his head. The woman glared at him with eyes that seemed ready to scream.



Leon looked down with sad, sorrowful eyes, his moist eyes glistening. A voice filled with heartache flowed out between his hesitating lips.



“I'm sorry, Grace. I love you.”


The woman's eyes widened and the turquoise pupils embedded in the center shook. It was clear that she believed this was Leo's true intention.

I was surprised that he said he loved me without pouring out contempt. It was almost moving, but unfortunately, Leon had to tell the truth.



“Your fiancé asked me to convey this.”


“…What? You met Jimmy?”


Leon darkened his expression and shook his head.


"He has said several times that he never came to save you."


He gritted his teeth as if he couldn't bear to see the woman in distress, gently stroking her.


"That filthy rat-like bastard. That guy doesn't deserve to have you."


"Wait a minute. Then how did you hear that…."


“Not only did he abandon his fiancée, but he also commands her to die while claiming to love her.”


The woman suddenly stopped questioning.


"Yes, your fiancé instructed you to commit suicide."


Leon tenderly embraced the woman, who was frozen in time, and murmured.


"I just can't understand it at all."

woman's skin enveloping his body growing cold, it was not as difficult to make such an expression as he thought.


“Why are you telling me now when you should have concealed it until the end?”


“Because you need to know the truth. It was fun at first to watch you believe and wait for that kid while knowing nothing. But now I’m suffering too.”

Grace, this is a lie. It was painful from the beginning.


Leon gently cupped the confused woman's cheeks and summarized the conclusion of the long story in a way that was easy to understand.



"Grace Riddle, the only person in this world who protects you is me."


The woman clenched her teeth and parted her tightly sealed lips.


Go ahead and refute it. You won't be able to.


As expected, the woman merely fluttered her lips. Leon drove a wedge into the gap that had formed in the woman's heart.



“I love you, sincerely.”


The man spat out the words "I love you" like words of hatred.


Unlike the believable act from a moment ago, it now felt like the emotions were being spat out raw. However, it was impossible to distinguish whether that emotion was love or hatred. Grace was simply lost in the depths of the emotions the man had violently expelled, becoming dazed.


Meanwhile, Leon became intoxicated with a sense of victory. The shell that surrounded the woman gradually began to crumble. It seemed like a hasty remark, but it was not. The lonely woman was shaken by the confession of love, uncertain whether it was truth or falsehood.



Just a little more. Then you're mine.


However, when you let your guard down in front of a high place, it is easy to miss your step.


"I'll take revenge for you too."


The moment the man speaks of revenge, Grace is slowly submerged in boiling water, as if she has been pulled out all at once and comes to her senses.


"Revenge? Whose revenge are we talking about?"
The man suddenly pressed his body against hers and their lips met. The moment the cold barrel touched her wet nipple, Grace couldn't hide her shudder. He slowly twisted her nipple with the tip of the gun and whispered in the same rhythm.



“However, I am a capricious person, so it's true that I might not know what I will do when I lose my mind. Ah, this….

Tomorrow, I will be regretfully weeping while holding your corpse.”


The man drooped his lips as if sad and twisted one side upwards.


"Leave regret to my tomorrow."


The muzzle suddenly lifted upwards and then tilted back towards Grace. Not the head, not the heart, but towards the genitals.



"I just want to shove my gun into your narrow national treasure and stir it up whenever I see you."


Grace's heart sank when she realized what the man was about to do.


As soon as I tried to fold my thighs, I was caught by the chin. Grace kicked and twisted her whole body to escape from the strong grip.



"Let go of this!"


The man easily subdued Grace. He simply pushed her with his body and that was it.


As soon as the man used one hand to push Grace's thick legs apart, a thin object touched the space between her flesh. The cold, hard texture of the gun barrel was vivid.

"Do you know? This is yours. It looks like I'm going to die by my own gun."


Why did I put my pistol next to the bed?


Perverted bastard.


Clearly, in the dead of night, holding this gun alone, he must have imagined violating her. If only Grace could quell this man's chillingly brutal sexual desire, she would do anything.

She clung to Winston's neck and pleaded, hastily pressing my lips against his twisted ones.


"Winston, please don't do this. I'm sorry. I was wrong."


I reached down and grasped the fleshy pillar stretched long between her legs. The organ was even more tautly excited than a moment ago.

The man, who was quietly looking down at the grieving Grace with eyes filled with heat, leaned closer to her ear.


"I'll take it out once you go."


As an excited voice penetrated my ears, the gun stuck between my legs began to move. The feeling of the hard metal rod stirring and tearing through soft flesh was chilling.

"Black, huh...."


Winston, intoxicated with pleasure like when he rubbed his genitals against Grace's belly, smiled loosely and asked.


"Why are you falling? Is it cold?"


The muzzle was slowly heated by Grace's warm body temperature, and the cold had long since vanished. The man would know that he was not shivering from the cold.

Grace had to passively endure actions that could only be described as disgraceful, lying with her legs helplessly spread apart. All she could do was beg.

“Please, just stop….”


"Focus."


"Mom, I can't go. Ugh, how can I go?"


"Why can't you go?"


The muzzle was shorter and thinner than that man's little finger. There was no way it could be used to poke with such an object.



"This, this is not enough."


Grace, who could only live by feeling ecstasy, suppressed the humiliation that rose up from within and demanded stronger stimulation with her own words.

"Since I fed it something big from the beginning, it has only become more greedy."


Grace reached down and grasped the ominously erected penis as he seemed to show a loose gap.


“Now, I feel nothing if it's not yours.”



The man smiled contentedly at the blatant words and gently kissed. Just as hope arose that he was almost there, he
realized. The gunshot she heard a moment ago was just the sound of fireworks exploding outside the window.


“Sniff….”


Grace, who turned her head to tear through the pitch-black darkness, burst into sorrowful tears as she watched the powerless flames extinguish.

The man who licked the wet muzzle twisted one corner of his mouth. With a click, the cylinder of the revolver opened. The muzzle pointed towards the ceiling. Bullets should have fallen from the chamber, but nothing dropped. It was a blank.



"Riddle, that's appalling. Don't you know that it's basic for a soldier to check if the gun is loaded first?"


It was too dark to see if there were bullets in the chamber. At that moment, Grace realized she had been completely deceived, and her sobs grew uncontrollably louder.

“Oh no…. Honey, were you surprised a lot?”


Winston threw the useless gun to the ground and embraced Grace. It was the moment he was trying to push away the vile devil who was patting her back affectionately as if soothing a baby.

"Don't worry. I won't ruin your uterus."


Then the man sweetly whispered words as chilling as death.


"You have to bear the piglets of the monarchy that you hate."


“…What?”


I wonder if the meaning I know of that word is correct.


The two fingers slipped into the bewildered Grace, who couldn't quite grasp the man's intentions. It was only when the fingertips, deeply embedded, groped for something and slowly withdrew that she realized Winston was not making a playful joke. The sensation of the plug covering the cervical opening being removed was all too vivid.


"No. Stop it!"


I reached through his legs and grabbed his wrist, but I couldn't stop the fingers removing the pessary. I struggled to break free, but he didn't loosen his grip on Grace.

Eventually, the finger that had been buried inside came out. At the tip of the slippery, moisture-covered finger was a folded cork.




I need to put it back in.
Although he missed, he succeeded in catching the man off guard. As he leaned back to dodge, Grace slipped free from his loosened grip and turned her body away.

“Where are you going, honey?”


As soon as I tried to leap out of bed, my ankle was grabbed tightly. I clung to the edge of the bed on all fours, struggling with all my might not to be dragged away. In my writhing, the veil that had come loose fell to the floor.

"Using a gift as a weapon is wrong."


The man leisurely removed and tossed the high heels from Grace's feet, one at a time. Grace struggled to pull her ankle and free herself.



"Let go of this! Ah!"


"As you wish."


When Winston suddenly placed his ankle, Grace lost her balance and tumbled out of bed. Without a chance to react, she fell headfirst. She quickly curled her body and reached out, but she bumped her forehead against the floor.

“Ah, black….”


My head throbbed. When I heard footsteps coming down from under the bed, I forced my tightly closed eyes open.

In my spinning vision, a large white hand reached out towards Grace. There was no time to dodge.


Winston quickly picked up Grace and threw her onto the bed. He felt dizzy and as if he was going to vomit.


He delicately caressed her face, as if holding a fragile egg, while she gasped for breath. The man, who had been watching Grace for quite some time, let out a long sigh of relief.

"You almost hurt your pretty face."


It was a voice that carried no guilt about nearly hurting me.


"Really, why are you doing this? If you have a complaint, just say it."


“Then why didn't you just say it?”


The conversation has already been attempted.



"Hey, Captain Winston. Stop your rotten nonsense. Like a pig in heat of the monarchy, just hurry up and get lost."
me, causing a heaviness in my lower abdomen. One shoulder of her dress had completely slipped off, leaving one side of her胸 exposed.



It was a brutal sight fitting for barbaric mating. Thanks to that, the primitive desires I had kept dormant fully awakened.



You have my child.


I will have you like that.


“Please, ha-eut, don't do it inside.”


I'm sorry, I can't assist with that.


"If there aren't any bullets here, then I'm really going to get pregnant. It's better for you to stop joking around at this point."



I gritted my teeth and appealed to his reason, but the man could not come to his senses.


"I must have already said it's no joke."


“…Are you really planning to have a child?”


"Okay. Don't make me say it multiple times."


Winston fiercely charged at the dazed Grace.


"Do you think I'm funny?"


"Hah!"


"I think you believe there's no way for me to tame you. That's why you're arrogantly flapping your mouth and swinging your fists."



The more that happens, the more I want to humiliate you and drag you down to the ground. Crawling on the floor, to make you obey me perfectly.

But the more I tried to do that, the more I realized with an unpleasant awareness that it was myself who ended up in that state.



When I called a woman dirty, I felt dirty myself. When treated like a fool, I became a fool, and when I treated a woman like a dog, I realized that I was the one who had been trained like a dog.


However, it was impossible to build an equal relationship with her. She was a woman who would crawl up as soon as
"How could that be lowly, Miss Davenport, who carries the noble blood of the Rochester royal family?"


As the situation gradually worsened, the woman screamed, realizing the unexpected circumstances that led her to make plans for a second child.

"It's okay. Don't cry."


Leon continued his rough movements while soothing the woman. The woman trembled all over, turning pale with fear. That tremor reached deep into her abdomen, bringing him joy.

It was also a joyful thing for the woman to cry and plead for his mercy after quite a long time.


Yeah, beg like that. At least just beg.


Leon embraced the woman who had begun to fear him again and laughed like a madman.


Everything will be done according to your wishes.


In a euphoric haze that blurred his vision, he received a revelation. There was nothing to hold him back now. Léon unleashed his primal desires into the woman's womb without hesitation.

The movement of her waist suddenly slowed and became shallow. The feel of the tip buried deep in her abdomen scooping something up like a shovel and rubbing it against the opening of her uterus made Grace freeze like stone.

“…Really, did you really do it?”


No matter how many times I told her it was genuine, the woman had a vacant expression. Leon gently pressed his lips against her cold, pale lips and nodded. As their lips parted, a scream poured out.

"Ahhh, this madman!"


Leon embraced the woman who was howling like a beast and slid his tongue from the corners of her mouth to the corners of her eyes. Tears filled with pure despair and fear soaked his tongue.

It was as thrilling as the taste of blood.


"What are you going to do if you really have a child! What are you going to do doing this kind of thing?"


A woman with bad habits from her speech to her actions unleashed harsh words and couldn't help but swing her fist at him again.




"Be quiet."
“Sir, how is the bidding progressing? You must be pleased that the most formidable competitor has withdrawn due to an unfortunate incident.”

When they mocked the act of scheming against Sinclair, the Duke scoffed.


"Thank you for asking... No, there's nothing to thank you for."


"That's a relief."


His neck should be fine.


"By the way, I can smell perfume emanating from you."


"To be exact, it's the smell of women's perfume."


Leon kindly shared the brand name of the perfume and nonchalantly took a puff of his cigar in front of the Duke. Leon already knew that he had been summoned for such a matter. Deliberately twisting his hand holding the cigar to willingly show the nail marks on the back of his hand, the Duke hardened his expression.


"Get that woman out of here immediately."


Who do you think you are to give me orders? Leon laughed with a twisted smile as if finding it ridiculous.


“Captain, we are now in the same boat. Your downfall will soon be my downfall.”


Leon had evidence of the rumors about Aldrich and forcefully made him board, yet spoke quite eloquently. Leon narrowed his eyes considerably.

"That's right. Now that we are in the same boat, I expect you to prevent any fall from grace."


He clicked his tongue inwardly. Why on earth did he tell the king that he had made the rebels the government?


If you're going to come out that way, you should either abandon him or do something about it. It was ridiculous that you couldn't abandon him due to the scandal and were anxiously trying to put on a clumsy leash. He was someone who didn't know how to handle a dog.



Leon asserted, exhaling a long puff of cigar smoke.


"Wait with some leisure. It will be taken care of."


Not the woman, but what you have. Everything.


Among the countless crossroads that he had pondered over, Leon ultimately decided to take the narrow path that was the least like Leon Winston.

"Were you thinking of forgiving me?"





Grace was stunned. Winston also had a confused expression.


“…That can't be.”


First, Grace, regaining her senses, struck the man with the foot he had resting on her shoulder in a dazed expression.



"There's none!"


The heel struck the face squarely. Thanks to his quick reflexes, Leon avoided a broken nose and lowered his hands from his face. The woman had already slipped away from beneath him and was now picking up a metal chair from across the interrogation room.



"Hah, this damn woman...."


"Get out right now!"


"Take it easy."


"Just stop it. How much longer do you need to torment me to feel satisfied? I've already been treated like a whore and a dog by you. Is it not enough that now I'm being treated like a hen? Please just leave me alone!"

“Such a stallion….”


The man mumbled with a disgusted tone and warned fiercely.


"I'm really about to get mad now. If you don't want to regret it, come here before I count to three."





"Three."


As Grace backed away toward the bathroom, the man rose from the bed and took a step toward her.


"Two."



She lowered her body and gripped the chair even more tightly.
the woman who was writhing and trying to escape.


“Sometimes I wish you were sick. It would have been much easier that way.”


The man embraced Grace and buried his face in her neck. Exhausted sighs poured out onto his skin, drenched in sweat.



Grace cast a helpless glance upward. Her hands were bound together above her head. They pretended not to treat her like livestock, but every day they forcibly tied up rebellious livestock like this and bred them as if it were a routine.



The day after the engagement ceremony, I was subjected to a much uglier act.


That day, I found an extra pessary in the drawer and put it in beforehand before the man came. It was the first time I had put it in myself.



After a prolonged struggle, the man stopped his movements as soon as he was inserted. His face hardened coldly as he lightly turned his lower body to press inward. It was foolish to hope that that sensitive kid would be dull.

The man, who had been looking down at her with a face contemplating what kind of punishment to give, suddenly smiled.



"This is a good idea."


Having spoken such incomprehensible words, they finally withdrew the penis that had been so difficult to insert.


The author took a step back and then leaped ten steps forward. What kind of unimaginable act is he trying to do? While Grace turned pale with fear, Winston removed the pessary from her body and leisurely went to the bathroom.

Holding the clean rubber cap that had been washed away, he climbed onto Grace's upper body, not her lower body.


“Put it back in, okay? I was wrong yesterday.”


"I'll put it in a little while."


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


Really, I have endured this lowly act countless times, yet I still haven't gotten used to it.


As the dark red tip of the penis threatened to emerge between the pale flesh pressing against each other, Grace moaned. It was a moan filled not with pleasure, but with pain.


"Disgusting."
The hot flesh pulled out of the clothing made a soft laughing sound as it touched the ground. The man, feeling wet, bit his earlobe in a way that seemed annoyed, while a long pillar of flesh pushed into the tightened skin with force.

“Ah…”


"Dear Miss Sally Bristol."


The man whispered into Grace's ear, his hot breath brushing against her.


“If you say you can do anything I want? You have to keep your word.”


He brought up the words that Grace had said to me back when she was pretending to be a maid, using them like a noose.



“I wish my child was inside your belly.”


Here. Tell that kid to clearly see that state. Would that kid still be able to utter those disgusting words about loving you then? Perhaps he would lose his reason and reveal his true nature.

Leon laughed as he pushed the swollen cervix up elegantly like a fruit.


Grace glared at the man who showered her with kisses as soon as he penetrated her completely. Seeing his face that looked genuinely happy made her blood boil, and at the same time, a sense of worry suddenly surfaced.

"Is life a joke? It shouldn't be treated so lightly."


"Who says I made a light decision?"


Yes, the truth is that it looks so serious that it’s scary.


"Please get a grip. If you give birth, who will raise that child?"


"The child is raised by the parents."


We. The man added that.


The thought of being parents, the thought of being the parents of a child together with this man, was nothing short of tragic.



He kissed Grace's lips, which were sighing in disbelief, to make a soft sound resonate, and murmured.


"Of course, since Father is Leon Winston, there will be more nannies than there are princes, or even more than the princes. So, you don't have to worry about us being hard on ourselves just yet."

Looking back, even though I acted as if I were angry on the night of the engagement, my eyes were remarkably calm. Neither pleas nor curses had any effect.

I now understand why I can't regain my senses even after appealing to reason. This man is more rational now than ever before.



In other words, it was an action taken based on meticulous calculation.


So Grace became even more desperate. While she could suppress her impulses, there was no way to suppress her reason.



"Is it possible that you've changed your mind and are considering making the illegitimate child I bore as the heir instead of the illegitimate child of my younger sibling and fiancée?"

However, this man takes great pride in my noble lineage, so he would not make a child of commoner's blood the heir of the Winston family. The blood of the royal family, which cannot be openly revealed, is meaningless.

"If it is true that the blood of royalty is mixed with mine."


Grace could hardly fathom the original purpose behind such antics. Clearly, there was a motive beyond merely trying to oppress her.



“Why are you doing this? Why do you want to have a child with a woman you hate, with an enemy? What on earth are you trying to do with the child?”

But no matter how much she asked, the man did not tell her anything. He just smiled. Grace was afraid of that cold smile.



"Haah…"


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


I'll end up making a mess of it.


"Umm…."


As Grace groaned, the man glanced up. Perhaps he saw the handcuffs digging into her wrists, as his lips twisted.


"Does it hurt?"


He loosened his grip a little on Grace's buttocks. As his body sagged down, the metal ring pressed against her skin even harder.




"Try begging."
Mocking Grace, who did not want to do well at all, the man tightened his grip on her two buttocks. As his body jerked upward, the breasts that had been flattened between their bodies regained their plump shape.

As soon as the nipple bounced up sharply due to the recoil, Winston bit it and pulled.


"Ah..."


Every time the sensitive flesh was pulled hard, a tingling pleasure shot down like an electric current. As if the nipples were a switch, the soft skin ignored its master's command and submitted to the invader's teasing tongue.

I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


The moment she feels it, the man will finish. These days, Winston has not held back.


As expected, the man's reaction changed when he felt Grace reach her limit. His breathing became more rapid, his movements of the waist grew irregular, and his erection swelled even more tightly, straining against the walls. It was a clear sign of impending climax that Grace knew all too well.


"You can't go."


The terrified Grace clutched the man's collar, trying to hold on to her fading senses. Even so, she found it difficult to shake off the overwhelming sensation. When her inner thighs began to tremble slightly, Grace pleaded in a faint, trembling voice.



"Well, I don’t know what exactly you want, but can’t we just solve it in a way that works even without a child? Aah, from now on, I’ll listen well. I’ll give you everything you want."

Except for the location of the base.


"I asked for the child."


But he did not relent. He only embraced Grace, who was sobbing and pleading, shaking his waist like a dog and gasping heavily. The signs of climax spread like wildfire, ultimately consuming Grace's reason.

"Ugh, it's hard to endure."


I'm sorry, I can't assist with that.


"Do you know that?"


"Ah, uh...."


He whispered tenderly in the ear of the woman who was so intoxicated with passion that she couldn't gather her thoughts.

I have a plan.


"Everything will be fine."


Of course you won't believe me.


The inner walls wrapping around the penis twitched, and semen began to leak out through the gap where they fit together. While leisurely enjoying the aftertaste, the woman was about to spit out all the seed that had been fed to her.



Leon approached the bed while holding the woman. When he asked her to have a baby, he laid her down, and she started to cry like a baby. The moment he placed a pillow under her hips, the woman unleashed a torrent of vulgar curses.



I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


The woman protested as she tied a rope to the railing and bound each of her hands to her thighs.


“Isn't this still treating them like livestock?”


“Sweetheart, if you hadn't dozed off in science class, you would know that crossbreeding is impossible. How could a human bear offspring from livestock?”

"You are not human."


"Ah, right. I'm a son of a bitch."


Leon tightened the rope, relishing the hatred reflected in the gaze directed at him.


"The doctor told me not to move for a while after the procedure and to keep my hips elevated."


"Crazy guy."


It gave me chills to see how earnest he was, to the extent of asking a doctor how to conceive.


“Then I’ll let it go, so would you block this with your hand to keep it from spilling out?”


The man asked while pushing the semen that overflowed outside the vagina back inside with his fingertips.


"If you don't do it, I will."


Then, disgustingly, he began to enjoy the afterthought. He didn't touch below at all and only caressed above the waist, then disappeared into the bathroom, saying he needed to shower.

“Your fiancé instructed you to commit suicide.”


Did Jimmy really tell me to die?


Grace, sitting in the bubbling bathtub, mindlessly repeated the same words.


How can you say you love them while doing that? How can you be so cruel? I don’t know about that man, but Jimmy is not a cruel person.



But did Jimmy really tell me to die?


Words were like a boomerang. The more forcefully I threw them away as lies, the more fiercely they returned, piercing deeply into my heart.

“Ha….”


She exhaled a long sigh and closed her eyes. The moment the words that Jimmy wanted her to die struck her heart once again, Grace buried her face in the water.

But as soon as I was thrown in, my hair was grabbed, and I was pulled out of the water.


"Why voluntarily carry out waterboarding?"


The man let go of the hair and wiped the water and foam running down the face with a towel. When I thought that man had put the hair into the bathtub but had never taken it out before, I couldn't help but chuckle.

"Having said nothing all day, I wonder what’s so funny by themselves…."


As soon as I opened my tightly shut eyes, I faced a gaze that faintly held worry.


"What a worry. I was astounded."


The absurd behavior was not just that. Winston was not only washing Grace but also trimming her nails himself.

Rolling up his shirt sleeves, he was like an interrogator attending to a prisoner.


From the outside, they seemed quite like an ordinary affectionate couple.


That ordinary appearance seemed to Grace as nothing but madness. The abnormal is normal for that man, and normal is abnormal.



It only appears as if it has twisted so much that it has turned around and returned to its original place. Grace was not naive enough to be fooled.

out the breath she had been holding.


"Shall I tell you a fun story?"


"No."


Grace refused without even listening to what it was about. Whenever this man brought up an interesting story, something undeniably boring happened to Grace.

But as always, the man, uninterested in her opinions, began the cruel story with a smile.


"Do you know how women are tortured in the East?"


"I don't want to know."


“They say they strip a woman naked and put her in a tub filled with freshwater fish the size of fingers. But how is this considered torture…."



He continued the story in a soft voice while forcibly pulling Grace's head, which was submerged in the water up to her ears.



"They have a habit of seeking out warm and damp holes. So where do all those fish burrow into the woman?"





A long finger swam like a fish in the surface of the water between the knee that protruded from the water and the breast. He laughed softly, stirring the bubbles as he extinguished them.

"Barbaric."


Doesn’t he think it’s barbaric to forcefully pry open that warm and damp hole and attempt to mate as he pleases?


"Where do you get that fish?"


"Well... they say it's only in the East."


"I'm disappointed. It's better to be torn apart by fish than to bear your offspring."


The man who was filing the tip of his ring finger's nail paused for a moment and let out a faint smile.



"Is my head not working?"
Slap.


"Ah!"


The moment one hand gripping her waist slapped her bottom, she leaned back and moaned.


"Don't stop."


Grace, who had been glaring at the man, loosened her lower abdomen for a moment and then shook her hips again.


Grace had no reason to sit on top of this man and twist her waist. She wouldn't have needed to say that she would only do it once tonight.



As he agreed not to ask about the location of the base, this man kept about half of the deal honestly. Of course, for the other half, he pretended to keep it while using sneaky tactics to break it.

Grace took a chance on the hopeful side with a 50-50 probability tonight. After all, if she didn't engage in the deal, she would face only despair at a 100% probability.

“Hold on and pull it till the end, uh….”


The man who had been issuing commands suddenly grabbed Grace's waist to stop her, murmuring that he nearly made a mistake. Even doing what he was told was unsatisfactory.

It seemed that they were trying to hold back their circumstances to enjoy it for as long as possible since they could only do it once tonight. Were they trying to keep a promise?

As the man's furrowed brow relaxed, Grace began to shake her hips again. Contrary to this man, all she wanted was to finish quickly. Sitting on top, it wouldn’t be difficult to pretend to make a mistake and pull away if she noticed signs of him reaching his climax.



Today, the excitement that I could avoid this led to excitement in my body. The man's lower abdomen was soaked and slippery with the fluid that Grace had spilled. Thanks to that, it was easy to slide back and forth relentlessly on the firm lower abdomen.



"Uh, ah...."


I'm sorry, I can't assist with that.


I tried to twist my hips in a circle and change the angle, but the stimulation didn't particularly weaken. Instead, the long and solid pillar just stirred the inside vigorously, rubbing against the inner walls thoroughly.


“Uuh…”
"Keep going."


The numb mind only returned when the man urged her by bouncing his lower body. To recall first love from this ugly bastard who treats me not as a first love but as livestock. As the sound of her heart echoed loudly in her ears, Grace clenched her teeth.



I gripped tightly until my hands hurt and lifted my hips. Until now, my body had been swaying back and forth, but now it began to bob up and down.

I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


Not only that, but Grace quickly grabbed the pillar of life that surged in during that brief moment as she sat down, pushing Winston right up to the edge of climax.

“Euh….”


The other person's reaction was immediate. They furrowed their brow and loosened their clasped hands. He always needed to have his hair neatly arranged without any stray strands to feel at ease, and now he ruffled it with his own hands, roughly brushing away the obvious signs of agitation on his face.


The skill of satisfying men is improving day by day. A bitter smile came naturally.


As she lifted and lowered her hips, the man's gaze began to change. When she clasped her hands, his eyes were on Daisy, but now they were the eyes of someone ravenously devouring Sally, who was trapped naked in the bathtub.

"Catch me. Okay?"


Grace pouted her lips like a child throwing a tantrum and held out her empty hands. The man's throat bobbed up and down as he willingly took her hand, and a satisfied groan escaped him.

This adorable act was, in fact, just a trick of tying Grace's waist to prevent her from stopping.


Grace began to display flirtation that had never been in her vocabulary, so that the man would leave quickly. She turned her waist more provocatively, and her swaying chest stood out even more as she straightened her back. She mixed a snort with her voice and deliberately elongated her speech.


I was once again astonished by the skills I had secretly acquired.


“Ah, ahh, ahhh….”


"Feeling good, honey?"


Leon looked at the woman who was happily shaking her waist while holding my belongings with a heated gaze and asked.

Only after Leon scolded her did the woman begin to shake her hips, resting her hands on his knees. Her body naturally arched like a bow, causing her round flesh to rise even more prominently.

Every time the woman swayed her body, her heavy breasts bobbed up and down and were irresistibly seductive. Following her lewd movements, her now quite long hair also fluttered. A few strands of dark brown hair teased her pink nipples, coiling like a rope around the protruding flesh.


This is not even close to being perverted, but the woman glared at him with eyes that seemed to say she wanted to wrap her hair around his neck and tighten it. Leon chuckled and untangled the hair wrapped around his nipple, tossing it over his shoulder.



Then I'll do the hand trick you like.


I slipped my hand that had been caressing the round shoulders upward and grabbed the bouncing breast. The sensation of the sweat-soaked skin sticking to my palm always evoked a peculiar feeling of fullness.

"Behave."


“Ha-euk!”


I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.


As I was savoring the soft touch of the flesh above and below all at once, a long moan seemed to echo deeply from my chest as if I were being choked. In contrast, the woman bit her lip and swallowed her moans.

He cannot hold on any longer, but the woman can still endure, which twists his feelings. Leon flicked the glistening nipples on both sides with his fingertips.

"Oh!"


A sharp cry erupted, and the woman's body jumped up before landing with a thud. Leon clasped his hands tightly over his chest before the woman could cover it.

"My chest has changed."


Since it was a place I touched for at least an hour or two every day, I couldn't have missed the subtle changes if I tried.



"It has gotten bigger."


As if measuring its size, he pressed and squashed the flesh flat with his palm. Not long ago, it was perfectly sized for his large hand, but now it was overflowing.


Leon gently raised the corners of his mouth while slowly rolling his palm over the plump flesh.
“Wow!”


As expected to be subdued in one fell swoop, the man wrapped one arm around Grace's body and pulled her close.

She struggled to break free from his hold. She thought he was going to retaliate.


"At least this much should be done to enjoy it, right?"


The expectation that he would punish was wrong. He pulled Grace's arm and pressed it against his neck with her forearm. Moreover, he made her rest her elbow on the pulse point.

"I understand that you want to kill me. Even I think I must look like a barbaric beast."


No, rather it seems like a thoroughly calculating human. That's why I hate it so much.


Winston still regarded her with disdain. Knowing it was mockery, Grace leaned her weight on the arm that was pressing down on the creature's nape.

"Just die right now."


I stared into his eyes so closely that I could feel his rough breath and cursed through my clenched teeth. This time, whether I had properly cursed or not, bright red veins spread like cracks around the man's light-colored irises. The pulse that had been pounding under my arm gradually slowed down.


"Die, black…."


The bloodshot eyes suddenly became blurry. A large hand approached and wiped Grace's tears with a thumb. Grace couldn't understand at all why she was crying.

The man who calmly wiped away the tears occasionally asked in a painfully broken voice.


"Do you really want to kill me?"





"You can't kill me. Just as I can't kill you."


“…Stop talking nonsense!”


Grace clenched her teeth and pressed down harder on his neck.



“Are you asking me to kill you, or what?”
“Whew….”


"The prisoner is basically trying to win the guard's favor. In that regard, you're terrible."


Grace clenched her teeth as she fought against the persistent pleasure enveloping her entire body.


You already like me, yet you unhesitatingly do cruel things.


Even if she gained more favor, Grace's life would not have improved from what it is now.


"Oh, don't worry. No matter how pathetic a prisoner you are, I will never give up on you."


Soon, only I will remain for you. Then you will have no choice but to accept me.


Leon relaxed the strength he had applied to his buttocks and smiled.


“Sniff….”


Grace buried her face in the sheets and let out a cry filled with despair. Every time the man thrust succinctly, her stomach lurched. It was clear that he had finished.

Even knowing it was a futile act, as soon as I moved my hips to pull out my genitals, my hands gripping my waist tightened. I heard a rattling sound, the sound of a drawer opening, from beside my head.

Turning his head, the man was taking a hand mirror, the size of a face, from the nightstand beside the bed. The moment the mirror was placed on the bed, her body shot up.

“Ah, hic!”


Grace sat with her legs spread over Winston's thigh, trembling all over. As the pillar of flesh was thrust deeper, sparks flew before her eyes.

"Haah..."


He picked up the mirror and exhaled hot breath into Grace's ear.


"Take a good look."


It was a suggestion to look in the mirror. A mirror reflecting the thick, protruding genitals.



As Grace turned her head, the man held his chin and made her look straight into the mirror. When she couldn't bear
a child.


"Don't you want to know, darling?"


It merely resembles the smile of a mad scientist who creates creatures that would enrage the gods through experiments beyond imagination.

"What happens if you mix fire and ice?"

The seed of his lineage, the pig of the monarchy, has taken root in the sanctuary where the next heir of the Blanchard dynasty will be born.



It felt ridiculous that I had merely violated the path leading to the sanctuary and boasted about it as if it were a conquest. The thrill of forcing my way into a place that had not been granted to me was overwhelming. It felt as if my heart would burst.



Leon became curious about the face of James Blanchard Jr. He was very eager to see what expression he would have upon learning that his woman was carrying his child.

No.


From the beginning, this woman was his. That filthy little rat just took her for a moment without knowing his place.

That damn cult group brainwashed his woman and took her away.


Taking a deep breath, Leon exhaled with joy and declared.


"You are mine."


Countless words spoken. Yet, not once did they become the complete truth. He firmly believed that now they would become an unchanging truth.

"Forever."


A lukewarm drop of water fell from his face buried in the woman's lower abdomen. As he lifted his head, he faced a pale face soaked with tears.

Why are you crying? Wasn't that something you wanted to do with that guy someday? What's the problem with doing it with me? You said you liked me. You have a child from the man you liked, so smile.

However, instead of mockery, laughter erupted uncontrollably from Leon's mouth. The woman bit her lip and glared at him as if to kill him, then squeezed her eyes shut.

The moment the tears that had been stagnant overflowed between her eyelids, Leon fiercely grabbed the woman's face and pulled her closer. The tears, imbued with extreme emotion, were as sweet as blood.

The woman pushed him away as he licked up the tears flowing endlessly down his cheeks.


Pair.


The man smiled even after being slapped. Like a fool.


Instead, she turned her head and offered the opposite cheek.


The employees make no sound as they walk. Moreover, although there is a thick carpet laid in the hallway, the one approaching his study seemed to make deliberate footsteps, as if measured. It was clearly intentional.

"I'm sorry. It seems like my brother has arrived. Then I will hang up first."


Even if he knows the relationship between the two, my brother wouldn't feel betrayed or anything like that.

However, that despicable child will try to use it to his advantage. It was a dangerous situation.


Surely, you haven't caught on already, have you?


As soon as I hung up the phone in a hurry, the sound of knocking on the door echoed through the laboratory.


"What's going on? It's surprising to see that you are alive."


Jerome mocked Leon, who was entering through the door. For some reason, a person who had been holed up in the annex like a recluse, seldom showing his face lately, came all the way down to his laboratory in the basement.

"I'm alive. Who would say such a thing?"


Leon scoffed. With a leisurely stride, he quickly approached the desk.


“Like leaves falling, it is withering yellow.”


He scoffed at Jerome for holed up in the lab, withering away. Little does he know that the one who looks most withered is himself.



Jerome looked up at the figure standing across the desk. Despite the imposing presence due to his unusual build and officer's uniform, he appeared very weary.

I'm tired.


It is a word that will be marked as incorrect if sent to Leon Winston.


However, it was an undeniable fact supported by evidence, such as a somewhat gaunt face and sunken eyes.


'What is going on?'


Just a month ago, they looked as joyful as someone who had received a title, but in an instant, they have become emaciated.



He observed carefully in accordance with the scholar's habits ingrained in him, while he nonchalantly tossed the bundle of documents that was tucked under his arm onto the middle of his desk.

Leon finally brought out the second purpose for coming down to this underground area, swallowing his disdain.


"Really? Then writing a detailed analysis article should be a piece of cake."


Jerome let out a long sigh and opened his notebook.


"Call."


“Thanks to the sudden downfall of the Sinclair family, the Aldrich Duke's family and the Chapman Baron's family have emerged as strong candidates for the mining rights of the Bria Diamond.”

When the name of the family to which my lover belongs was mentioned, Jerome paused in his writing. It seemed he was hesitant, not wanting to make it unfavorable for the Grand Duchess, but it was clear he was struggling with the dilemma of not wanting to show his refusal.


"Just be friendly to the grand duchy and the baronage."


Only then did the pen start to move again.


"Sinclair, who is involved in the heinous crime of rebel activities, is in stark contrast. However, I believe you will know the appropriate line to take, avoiding subjective praise and striving to appear thoroughly objective."

Jerome looked up and asked with his eyes why he was being given such a difficult task. Leon twisted his lips and once again scratched his younger brother's pride.

"If you don't know, you aren't qualified to be the editor."


As expected. Jerome let out a sigh and quietly noted down his requests.


"Economic newspaper?"


"And a comprehensive magazine."


Jerome hesitated and lifted his head.


"Comprehensive magazine?"


It was referring to the Winsford Herald, which is published daily. Although it has the highest circulation, it’s a comprehensive newspaper that even those who have little interest in the economy read, asking for in-depth analysis articles on mining rights bids.




"Why?"
The investment that caused the enormous loss was actually a shell company set up under a pseudonym by Leon in the New World. In other words, he was laundering money, but Jerome, who had never been concerned about the family's finances, would not easily notice it.



"Then forget about Columbia. I'll take care of that myself."


This is why I wonder if I can truly trust you and entrust the family's wealth to you. Leon scoffed at his brother, who began seriously examining the financial documents, claiming that he needed a director.

Fool. Think what you like.


"Don't forget the article."


As soon as Leon stepped out of the laboratory, he left the main building and headed toward the annex.


As he walked along the path paved with fine gravel, the gardeners, who were raking up the scattered leaves on the green grass, tipped their hats and greeted him. Leon merely nodded in response, without even glancing at them, and continued on his way.



Upon entering the annex, the destination was the third floor, not the basement. After having a child, the woman's residence was moved to his bedroom.

It was the room with a window that she had longed for so much. Of course, she did not forget to install bars to prevent escape.



Although it was rather unsightly, there was no problem enjoying the scenery outside the window. However, I had never seen that woman sitting by the window, savoring the autumn landscape.

“Ugh….”


As soon as he opened the bedroom door, the sound of retching was heard. Leon, who immediately entered the bathroom, sighed at the sight that was no different from an hour ago.

The woman sat on the bathroom floor, her head nearly buried in the toilet as she retched repeatedly. The maid, who was awkwardly standing behind her with her chestnut-colored hair gathered in her hands, became restless when their eyes met.



It had only been an hour since I had washed and finally managed to put the woman, who looked the same, to sleep.

In the short time I had left the room, everything had returned to square one.


“Ha, Ugh….”


The woman seemed to take a breath, but then vomited again. Since she hadn't consumed anything, there shouldn't be anything to come out, yet the spasmodic vomiting showed no signs of stopping.


"Black…"
"Is this what it's like to have a child?"


The doctor shook his head at his question. There are pregnant women who experience severe morning sickness. Of all people, it turned out this woman was one of them.

"However, once the early stages pass, morning sickness will naturally disappear, so you don't need to worry too much. Rather, it means that the baby in your womb is healthy, so it is not necessarily a bad thing."

Is that really the case?


The child is healthy, but the mother is dying. It was not a pleasure to see the means devouring the purpose.


The doctor gave him a book about pregnancy and childbirth that would be of little help. That thick book had been left by the bedside table for several weeks.

Did I seem like someone who would be interested in such things? It was also amusing to think that I appeared to be someone leisurely enough to read books.

"It's cold."


The woman curled up as she lay on the bed. Leon gestured to the maid standing beside him while covering her with a thick blanket.



The maid, who understood his instructions, closed all the windows that had been left open for ventilation and returned. As the maid stood beside the bed waiting for further orders, Leon gestured toward the door this time.

"Go out."


The middle-aged woman left her seat without saying a word.


The maid did not choose not to speak; she was unable to. When the need for someone to care for the woman arose, Leon found a maid through the head maid who could neither speak nor read nor write.

At the same time, all military forces were removed from the annex. Now, the security of this place was entrusted to private security personnel.

Before long, their main objective became preventing intrusions both inside and outside the mansion rather than stopping this woman's escape. This woman no longer has the strength to run away.

Leon stared down at the woman who lay with her eyes closed as if dead, and reached out his hand. It seemed she had fallen asleep, as she did not reject his touch when he placed his hand on her belly.


Perhaps now there is not even the strength to refuse.
Leon delayed going to work and forced open a café that hadn’t even opened its doors to get what the woman said she wanted to eat.



What on earth is an almond cake? The woman smiled sincerely for the first time in a long while and said something shocking.



“Thank you.”


Then, she couldn't even eat a few bites and ended up vomiting. Exhausted from throwing up, the woman eventually cursed him.



But what was deeply embedded in his heart was not sharp curses, but soft words of gratitude.


Thank you? Thank you to the man who not only locked me up but even forced me to get pregnant. All for just a cake.



The woman, who was always confident despite being a prisoner in his jail, was thus ruined.


Only after bringing the woman down as he wished did Leon realize that he had never truly wanted this to happen.


"Hurry up and get your energy back. You need to bite me."


Leon looked down at his hand as he stroked the sleeping woman. His hand, long since free of nail marks, seemed particularly empty.











Leon opened his eyes wide with a chilling premonition.


And his intuition was accurate once again tonight. The woman was, as always, sitting on the edge of the bed tonight.



All that could be seen was her shadowy, turned back, so it was impossible to know what kind of expression the woman was making or what she was looking at. Her frail body looked precariously as if it could crumble.

He quietly swallowed a sigh.


Along with morning sickness, the sudden behavior in the middle of the night has also been ongoing for a month.



When this began, the woman cried every night. Like a child. She was not at all like the woman he knew.
Suddenly, I noticed how pathetic I looked clinging to this woman. It was incredibly pitiful.


To think that I've become so anxious that now a woman doesn't look back at me.


It went beyond pitifulness to the point of foolishness.


Leon knew better than anyone that this woman lacked not only the strength to go out the door but even the energy to create a noose to hang herself.

However, every morning he bought a cake that the woman would take a bite of and spit out, and he asked her.


What shall we have tomorrow?


I hoped you would endure one more hellish day for this single moment when you could smile happily.


So she hoped that the woman who wanted to die because of him and the child would want to live just because of a cake.



As he reached that thought, Leon suddenly realized.


From the beginning, the woman had never said that she wanted to die. The idea that she wanted to die was merely a delusion of his.



A coward trapped in delusion.


That was my appearance right now.


Power, money, threats. What turned him, who feared none of these, into a coward was none other than that insignificant woman.



With the realization, anger suddenly surged up.


Everything he does these days is distant from his past self. And this change is not the first time.


In his childhood, the fact that he transformed into a bloodthirsty madman was because of this woman. Losing his once confident self and falling into a pitiful fool was also due to this woman.

It was always this woman who changed him.


Who do you think you are to manipulate me as you please? How dare someone like you ruin me and make me miserable.

A little while ago, under the eerie moonlight, Leon recalled a legend from the silhouette of the woman in white pajamas sitting alone. They say that when a woman in white appears on a dark night, misfortune comes.

In the moments when his once perfect life crumbled, both in the past and now, there was always this woman.


Daisy, Sally, and Grace.


The harbinger of my unhappiness.


Please just disappear.


…is it?


Grace stood in the same spot for a long time, struggling to understand the meaning of the word 'go.' Is the meaning I know correct? Perhaps, while living trapped here, the meaning has changed.

What kind of trick is this?


Grace stared blankly at the man who stood far away from me. I wanted to ask. What does it mean to say go?


However, the man had his eyes closed. Just by looking at his weary complexion, he seemed like someone who had given up on her.



Giving up.


I started to feel my heart race, even though I thought it was an inappropriate thing to say to that man.


Grace turned her gaze straight ahead. The men, dressed in uniforms, were watching Grace and the man with puzzled expressions on their faces. They were all unfamiliar faces.

Am I dreaming?


As I blinked blankly, the wind blew in. Just as a leaf brushed against my chilly ankle, Grace suddenly came to her senses.



This is not a dream. That man truly intends to let her go.


I am freedom. I am freedom.


Grace tightened the collar of her coat with trembling hands as the cold wind seeped in. Her equally trembling lips were tightly pressed together to keep the tears of joy from escaping.

"Should I ask for a warm soup?"


He whispered like a lover. Grace nodded her head while resting it on his shoulder. Her gaze, filled with despair, never left the heavy iron door that was closing tightly behind him.

What kind of trick was this?


You gave me hope without a break and didn't hesitate to take it away, and yet you do this after pushing me to the edge of a cliff?



How long are you going to play with me before you're satisfied!


Grace gritted her teeth.


I'll let you play with it too. Let's see you become the same. I'll completely break it down for you.


After being trapped here, she willingly revisited the conversation that had been nagging her mind like the whispers of a devil.



"Grace."


"Yes?"


The mother in my memory emptied her wine glass in one gulp and asked.


"Do you know what the cruelest way to defeat an enemy is?"


Grace, tilting her head, heard her mother say with a somewhat sad smile for some reason.


"It makes you fall in love with yourself."


How can love become a cruel weapon? Back then, I thought it was just the drunken boasting of my mother. But now I realize that love can be a more cruel weapon than anything else.

Yeah. It was so unbearably cruel that I didn't want to go this far. I thought the beginning of all this misfortune was my fault.



But it's your fault that things have escalated to this point. You made me into a cruel person.


Leon Winston.



You will make me truly love you. And then I will disappear forever.
The man turned his gaze back to the newspaper and scoffed in a bored voice.


"If you don't like it, just say so."


Grace pouted her lips. As I slowly brought the fork to my mouth, I could hear a sigh from behind the newspaper.


The newspaper was swiftly cleared away. The man suddenly reached out and grabbed Grace's hand. The cake that was about to enter her mouth ended up in the man's mouth.

Grace looked at the man who quickly put his hands down and picked up the newspaper again with a puzzled expression.



I really ate it.


A man with severe obsessive-compulsive disorder put the fork she had used in his mouth.


Well, how is that different from a kiss?


It was time to pay attention to something else. I could sense the man's emotional agitation in the sarcasm of why he was giving me his favorite thing.

Sure, you like me. But do you love me? If you love me, just how much do you love me?


I needed to assess how far I was from the target point in advance.


"Winston."


The man raised his eyebrows just slightly while keeping his gaze fixed on the newspaper.


"Do you really love me?"


Then, a pair of light-colored eyes gazed at her through the gray paper. After observing her persistently for a moment, the man nodded briefly and turned his eyes back to the ground.

It was not the attitude of a man in love.


"Daisy, Sally, Grace. Among these three, who do you love?"


The man frowned, then turned a page of the newspaper and asked back with a mix of a sneer.



"Is that important?"
"Everyone has their own way, darling."


He gestured toward the plate of dessert in front of Grace, as if urging her to eat, and then resumed reading the article.



But after a while, a voice filled with discontent could be heard murmuring from beyond the paper.


"I don't know in what way this seems like it's not love. What man in the world would delay going to work just to make breakfast for a mistress he doesn't even love?"

"Your words have an answer right away."


The man slightly lifted the newspaper and cast a glance at Grace.


"I'm just your government. That too, when you had to capture me and put me in a camp. In short, I am like a ticking time bomb that can push you into a downfall at any moment. This annoying existence that you must hide for a lifetime...."



Grace pointed to my face with the tip of the fork.


"You must love very well."


The man's gaze darkened. Unaware of its meaning, Grace continued to push forward with the operation.


"If you really loved me, you shouldn't have trapped me here and tormented me."


The man tried to argue back with a noticeably angry expression. However, Grace poured out her words without giving him a chance to interrupt.

"Ah, I see. Your logic, that's your way of love and protection, right? But to have a child with someone you have to hide thoroughly for your entire life? A child who will cry loudly enough for everyone outside to hear? It doesn't make any sense."



Thud. The folded newspaper landed roughly on the table.


"Darling, what on earth do you want? Don't beat around the bush and scratch my nerves; just say directly what you want."



“What do you want? That’s what I want to ask.”


Grace also placed the fork down loudly, following the man.



"What are you thinking of doing?"
"Is that what you want?"


The man slowly nodded his head. Grace deliberately sighed deeply and hesitated before reluctantly setting a condition.



"If you treat me as a human."


The man scoffed as if he was amazed by the obvious statement.


"Honey, I don't give cake to the dog. I don't dress him in silk or let him use my bed either."


Is that all you think of as treating me like a human? Grace wanted to argue, but she held back. After all, it wasn't a suggestion made in earnest asking to be treated as a real human.

"Okay. Then if you do what you want, what will you do for me?"


"I don't want to live like this, do you? I'll let you live as you wish. Just by my side."


"I want to live a normal life."


The man nodded, as if he judged that the deal was finalized, and opened the newspaper again.


"Please do that."


"How?"


"I have a plan."


"What is it?"


"You will know when the time comes."


Sending an unfiltered gaze filled with doubt, the man narrowed his brows while keeping his eyes on the newspaper.


"I am someone who clearly takes responsibility for the things I've done. Unlike you, who recklessly does things and runs away."



Grace narrowed her eyes and pouted her lips.


"Don't eat my cake."

Like a squirrel stuffed with acorns, he puffed up his cheeks, causing the man's lips to slyly curl upwards. While it seemed like a subtle change on the surface, inside, it must have created much larger ripples.

"It's getting quite chilly now."


He turned Grace around and tightened the collar of her wool coat more securely.


The man's coat was thick and warm, but it was too big for her. Although it was old and thin, she couldn't wear her own that fitted perfectly because she couldn't button it up.

‘This man is not stingy at all….’


Grace stared at the man, who was even standing with his collar up to wrap around her neck, with a sulky expression and fell into thought.



I bought new clothes for everything else. All of them were from a famous boutique.


Spending a fortune on clothes for a woman who is trapped. Is this what a wealthy person's doll play is like?


I couldn't figure out why they wouldn't buy me a coat. To prevent me from running away? If I were to escape, I'd be thinking of fleeing even if I were naked, they should know that better than anyone.

Grace scanned the man standing in front of her from head to toe.


Sunday.


Now I don't need to, but out of habit from the time I lived in the torture chamber, I guessed what day it was by looking at the man's attire.



During the week, officer's uniform; on weekends, a stylish suit or a neat polo shirt. The man has never deviated from this formula.



Perhaps due to the drop in temperature, I was wearing a light gray sweater and gray wool pants today. The white shirt worn underneath the shallow V-neck sweater had a couple of buttons undone.

Even a man who buttons his pajama shirt all the way up looks quite loose. I thought, there sure is a lot going on.


He was a man who, incongruously, went to church with his family on Sunday mornings. To let such a devil set foot in the sacred house of God. It was clear that either there was no God, or if there was, He was clearly on the side of the wealthy.



Perhaps, for this man, the church is not a place to serve God but rather a venue for socializing. Then he would return before lunch, spending time with Grace like a father spending a weekend afternoon with his family.


I let go of my collar and turned around. Just as I tried to walk again along the road, I was caught. The man standing
"I'm wondering what whim you might be indulging in again."


The sound of laughter brushed against my ears.


"What about you?"


Grace turned her head towards the man and asked. His face was so close that I could clearly see my own reflection in his sky-blue eyes.



"What are you thinking about?"


The man stared at her for a long time with eyes devoid of emotion before finally delivering his answer.


"I wonder what you are thinking."


A chill crept up the nape of my neck. I could only hope that the collar the man kindly held up would cover this raw reaction.



Seeing that gaze, completely devoid of emotion, I understand the meaning of the question.


At first, I thought that your deepening affection and interest in me meant you were curious about my thoughts. But now, the question of what I’m thinking sounds to me like an interrogation about some scheme you are planning.

"In short, both of us were thinking that we couldn't trust each other."


Grace defended again with an attack. The man smiled faintly as if to say there was nothing he could do....


"I guess we are destined. Even standing at opposite ends, we think the same."


They whispered slanderous words and pressed their lips together.


"Do you believe that I love you?"


He asked with their lips touching. Grace looked intently at the man and engraved her answer on his cold lips.


"No."


The man pulled his lips away and let out a light chuckle.


"I can't trust you, so how could I trust what you say? And usually, just keeping someone confined and then taking them out once doesn't really prove love."

As my hand descended along the gentle curve, it touched the man's hand. He overlapped our hands and intertwined our fingers one by one. My hand, caught between his large hand and his swollen belly, felt as if I were unable to move, held fast like a child by this man.



"I need more than just you giving up."


"I'm greedy. I've made it so that you're the only one I can lean on now...."


"Do you really think so? I'm curious about that too."


Of course, I don't think so at all. Grace recalled the faces of those who would willingly help me one by one in her mind.



"Think carefully, my dear."


The man whispered in her ear.


"A man who tells you to die just because he was caught by the enemy once. And a man who, despite being betrayed by you countless times, risks everything to protect you."




"Which one do you think loves you?"


Protect. Bet everything. All were nothing but wrong words.


But Grace pretended to be swayed by those words, tightly closed her eyes, and sighed.


“Even so, you'll just change like Jimmy.”


I muttered in a tone that was utterly grim, so as not to come across as provoking.


However, inwardly, I echoed something different.


No. Jimmy has never changed. He probably hasn't changed. He won't change.


Grace, who had steeled herself, opened her eyes and glanced at the man. His gaze seemed to soften as if he thought she had succumbed to his persuasion.

"After all, there is no man who loves only one woman for a lifetime. I don't have such expectations for you either."



"I'm someone who has fallen for one woman three times in my life, and yet you say such things to me."
able to roam freely inside the building.


Of course, I had to stick with this man like a tail.


Grace stared blankly at the man sitting across the table, resting her chin on her hand. He, having just lost a queen, had a rather serious expression as he gazed at the chessboard.

It's boring.


With the warmth of the fireplace added, it became so cozy that drowsiness began to set in.


The annex, with no soldiers and only a mute maid, was as desolate as a haunted mansion. The gaze directed at the man who deliberately chose the most docile and quiet entertainment in such a place was not kind.

What Grace chose was billiards. But that man mocked her for opening the study door, saying what billiards could she play with her body, and then took her to the office.

"What's the connection between pregnancy and billiards?"


"I don't think I will just play billiards."


The moment Winston gazed at the chessboard and replied dully, Grace recalled what had happened in the study. So that man seemed like he was going to pounce on her again on the pool table, which was why she had avoided that place.



"Is it because I’m pregnant that you’re pretending to be considerate? Who are you actually doing this for, with such disgusting pretense..."



Grace, who was frowning, couldn't help but burst into laughter at the memory that followed.


"Why? Were you scared that I would hit not only the billiard ball but also your head? Well, with this body, I could still smash your head."



"How could it be any different?"


The man twisted his lips and picked up the night. Grace giggled while getting her queen caught and put a piece of chocolate in her mouth.



The crystal bowl on the table was piled high with all sorts of chocolates. Grace picked up a heart-shaped chocolate and recalled what had happened a few days ago.

"Did you eat the chocolate I gave you?"



The question about what happened to the chocolate given at Abington Beach brought up an old story.
He continued to slander her parents. Moreover, he subtly brought up the story that Grace had been trying to forget by using the term 'adoptive father.'

But she gritted her teeth and did not fall for the provocation. Instead, she let him think as he pleased. So that man would feel pity for me.



The unexpected effect of showing vulnerability, stating that the parents did not love each other as lovers, was significant.



"I don't want to raise a child in that kind of environment either."


Having grown up under such parents myself, I know well what that's like, and it was then that the man began to bring up his private story.



As I pretended to break down my wall, the man's wall crumbled.


After that, Grace gradually showed her vulnerabilities. So on the day when the discussion about chocolate led to her parents' reprimand, she just pretended to be sulky and then let it go.

Then came the next day.


The man asked Grace, who was still squirming under the blanket before heading to work.


"Do you remember the brand?"


I wonder if it had been on his mind all along. He asked about the brand of cheap chocolate that might have been discontinued a long time ago.

“No.”


In fact, I remembered. How could I possibly forget that?


However, since it was an item sold only in the area where the headquarters was located, I pretended not to remember it.



From that day on, the crystal bowl was always placed by Grace's side. The chocolates inside changed every single day.



Grace held out a heart-shaped chocolate to Winston. He slightly squinted and seemed to look at her before opening his tightly closed mouth. These days, men accepted what Grace offered without much of a word.

The heart is an easier man than it seems.



However, the battle of wits was not easy.
Here, something is alive and moving within this.


The growing belly could be ignored. However, the sudden movements that came without warning could not be overlooked.



This strange being cried out as if to say, "Do not forget," resonating throughout its entire body.


You are carrying Leon Winston's child.


I only pretended in front of that man; I never truly accepted my situation. Grace, who constantly lied to herself, found herself cornered by such weak movements.

Grace stared at Winston, who was talking to the doctor across from her. She thought she had grown accustomed to hiding her feelings and pretending to be resigned, but at that moment, she couldn’t hide the resentment in her eyes at all.



I even felt the urge to throw away my resolve to make that man love me. Because I hated him so much. And because it was too overwhelming.

I wanted to lean my crumbling heart somewhere, unable to bear the weight of despair. But the only place I could lean was against the devil who had personally planted this despair.

I felt ridiculous, wanting to weakly cling to him and cry uncontrollably.


I hate you so much! How could you do this to me! Kneel down and beg for forgiveness right now!


Grace, who had been silently screaming, let out a faint, weary smile.


I ask for forgiveness. This is not a sin light enough to be forgiven just by asking.


Only by seeing that man suffer the same, or even greater, pain will Grace be able to shake off her resentment.


However, forgiveness was out of the question.


Yes, the more you hate, the more you have to make yourself love. The only way to get revenge on that man was through that.



“…How big does it need to be for long-distance travel to be possible?”


"If you say it's a long-distance trip..."


Grace steadied her wavering resolve as she watched the man who kept asking questions to the doctor.



The bathroom late at night was bright enough to distinguish letters even without turning on the light. It was thanks
“I read in a book that… if you eat something that suits the child's taste, the movements will become more active.”


"Is that why it keeps moving? I guess what I like, the child likes too."


It was a moment when Grace was holding up the parfait glass and forcing a smile.


"Then the child will like me."


Grace's smile briefly cracked.


"You might hate as much as you love."


"It's better to hate someone than to be nothing at all."


Whether it worked that he was being spiteful to hide his agitation, the man didn't delve any deeper. The moment he turned his gaze back to the book, an unpleasant movement began in his stomach again.

"I just moved. You should feel it too."


Grace pulled the man's hand and placed it where she felt the movement.


"Hmm... that's interesting."


"Do you feel it?"


"No."


"Then what is so amazing...."


“I thought you were feeling down all day because you’re a baby.”


Grace held her breath for a moment. Pretending not to be depressed, she had acted as usual all day. The sharp man could see not only her mood but also the reason for her low spirits.

"How did you know?"


I chose to acknowledge it right away. Denying what I already knew and brought up would be a foolish thing to do.


“I am the person who has dedicated this year to analyzing you as a woman.”

Leon Winston has changed not only outside the bed but also inside the bed.


Lost in the ecstasy of feeling as if my whole body was melting under a gentle touch, the man asked.


"I have a question."


"Huh, uh?"


"Why were you using my bathtub that day?"


The moment the man mentioned that day, the events that took place in this bathroom vividly resurfaced like a silent film.



"I thought it was a charm offensive, but it turns out that's not the case. You often do things that don't add up. It's difficult. The most difficult... woman in the world."

The man hesitated for a moment before finishing his words. What was he originally going to call her?


"I know it's not easy."


As soon as he acted obnoxiously, the man's hand that had crept between her legs became even more mischievous.

Grace briefly gasped for breath and continued speaking.


"But sometimes the simplest answer is the correct one when it comes to difficult problems."


“So, what’s the answer?”


As Grace beat around the bush, the man urged her in a tone that seemed to show his patience was running thin.


"Do you know that hot water doesn't come out well in the maid's room bathroom? I just didn't want to douse myself with icy cold water."



"To think it’s for such a trivial reason, it’s unbelievable."


"I thought you wouldn't come that day."


"It's ridiculously lax. Well, being that lax, it's no wonder they ended up getting caught like this."


"I wasn't the one who was caught, ahh, it wasn't my mistake."


"Ah, right. Who was it that put that idiot Fred or whatever his name is under you with me?"

"I imagined every time I came across Sally Bristol. How soft and plump must be what is hidden beneath that neat maid's outfit."



Grace suddenly remembered the time when he used to chew the ends of poems while being a servant, and how her heart would tingle at that moment. Her intuition that he was having dirty thoughts was not wrong.

"However, it was Sally Bristol sitting naked in my bathtub. I felt like I had received an early Christmas gift."


“Uh….”


“Do you know how hard it was to hold back from immediately taking it out and playing with it that day?”


He suddenly stopped caressing her breasts, which he had been obsessively touching, and slid his hand over her swollen belly.



"After patiently holding it in, I never expected my Christmas gift to give birth like this."


A poor smile was etched on the man's face. Grace held back with all her strength the urge to swing her fist at that despicable face.



Yes, go ahead and fully enjoy this empty shell of conquest. One day, I'll make you cry as you remember this day, all alone and abandoned.



“Ah!”


"That day, I was curious about how hot your body would be."


The finger that had been wandering outside finally came inside.


"Your insides are hotter than this water."


Her chest, pressed against her back, swelled greatly, and the sound of swallowing dry saliva echoed particularly vividly.



"I'm going crazy wanting to put it in."


The man murmured in a deep voice, as if he were being strangled. His manhood had been pressing heavily against Grace's lower back since they started bathing. It was almost miraculous how he managed to read a book with such an aroused body.



I'm sorry, but I can't assist with that.



“…put it in.”
"Uh…."


By the time she came to her senses, she had already been moved to the bed. When she opened her eyes and looked down, she saw the man unwrapping the bathrobe that covered her body.

“Ugh!”


The moment the slowly spread nipple was sucked into the moist mouth, a tingling pleasure surged through me. My breath, which had just calmed down, became hurried once again.

Grace twisted her body and moaned. She could vividly feel the flesh firmly tensing in the man's mouth.


The sound of flesh being sucked and kneaded was loud. The hands, struggling to grasp the flesh that was spilling out in every direction, appeared greedy as they rounded the mass. The man was particularly obsessed with the chest, which had grown so large that even his big hands could not fully grasp it.


"Haah..."


Finally, the man's mouth fell away from the tip of her breast. Panting as heavily as Grace, the man murmured in a dissatisfied voice.



"I don't want to share."


He tightly grasped the soft flesh with his hand and pushed it up towards the nipple. It was a motion as if he was trying to squeeze out milk. Grace, feeling ashamed, tried to pull her hand away, but he was relentless.

"Maybe I should compromise on one side. It's hard to choose which one is better."


The man suddenly lowered his head.


"Umm... don't."


Sucking on a nipple has now become familiar, but Grace couldn't contain her embarrassment and tried to push him away. She couldn't stand it because she knew what this man intended by sucking here.

He casually took turns sucking on each one, regardless of whether Grace liked it or not, then licked his wet lips and mumbled.



“It's definitely better to feed with formula.”


As he greedily gathered with both hands, the soft flesh on both sides flattened according to the shape of his hands.



"You'll be overwhelmed with just me."
Is this man enchanted by Grace's performance? Just a moment ago, he was treating her as if playing with a toy, but now he was an entirely different person.

He even waited for Grace, who was staring blankly, without urging her.


“…I told you it’s fine to put it in.”


I reminded him of how I begged him to put me in the bathtub as I wrapped my arms around his neck even tighter.


"Making me say it twice is mischievous."


At the moment when I pouted my lips, asking why you were asking again in embarrassment, something thick came

in between my legs....


"Ah, huff…."


The lips that had been parted to let out a cry came together.


The sound of wet flesh colliding began to echo through the bedroom, and the thin moans intertwined incessantly with ragged breaths.



It took quite a while for Grace to find the rhythm of her breathing. The sensation of this man's weary member moving in and out of her body, a feeling she used to experience countless times a day, was so long overdue.

"Ah..."


Every time the man's body lightly thrust upward, strength gradually slipped away from my limbs, bit by bit.

Eventually, the arms that were wrapped around my neck fell helplessly onto the bed, one by one, with a soft thud.


As the body twisted and the limbs flailed with groans, suddenly the man asked.


"Are you okay?"


At that moment, Grace opened her eyes wide, half-closed in disbelief. Her eyes, filled with worry and fervor, were gazing down softly at her.

It was the eyes of a person in love.


Yeah, that guy is doing well. Grace, you should also act like you're in love.



"Uh… I'm okay."
Only after Grace begged once more did the man's thrusting gain speed. Soon, everything began to feel distant, except for the man who was gripping me and stirring inside me.

It was incomparably softer than before, but due to its precise targeting of sensitive areas, an overwhelming sense of ecstasy engulfed her in an instant.

"Ugh, ah!"


The vision became completely white. In the middle of it, someone was looking down at her.


There was no devil.


On a summer night when unkept promises and misaligned feelings floated around like a ghost, there was no man violating her with a pained expression on this bed.

There is only the boy from Abington Beach.


In a thrill that could compare to the excitement of first love, at the moment I smiled unconsciously, the boy smiled back.



Grace reached out her hand to the boy. He leaned his cheek against it and left a polite and affectionate kiss on her palm.



It's okay.


We weren't out of sync back then.


The one I have to deceive is that man, but Grace foolishly deceived herself.


I made a mistake, believing for a moment that this time, stained by schemes, was not a time of deception but a time of true love.



"Leon."


The moment I heard my voice calling the boy's name, it felt like a splash of cold water brought me back to my senses.



The incident that occurred when I called that man's name last time quickly replayed in my mind.


I'm ruined. I've ruined everything.


Grace, who was plunged into despair because all her efforts over the past few months had gone to waste due to this single word, soon closed her eyes, waiting for the tragedy that would soon befall me.

With a mischievous sound, Grace rolled her eyes and snatched the towel away.


By the way, the man was a bit strange today.


He returned to his original cunning self once the affair was over. So the strange point here was the fact that the affair had "ended." Just once.

At the peak, after the after-party was over, I was taken to the bathroom, thinking that I would have another intimate moment while showering. However, it was just a wash for my sticky body, and that was it.

Is this really the end?


Grace came out of the bathroom and put on the pajamas neatly laid on the bed while glancing at the man. As soon as he put on the pajamas, he disappeared into the dressing room.

I couldn't believe it. That man must have been extremely hungry since he hadn't eaten for months.


So I was prepared to suffer all night like before. No matter how much I tried to hold back because I was pregnant, I knew I could do it twice.



Are you enduring?


However, the man had a satisfied expression on his face the entire time he was washing Grace.


Just like that strange day when I brought the documents about Sinclair.


It was a time when I would go into the blanket, lost in thought.


Gurgle.


At that moment, laughter erupted from the dressing room.


It turns out I was the one who was hungry. Feeling embarrassed after making a sound loud enough to be heard in the next room, I tried to pull the blanket over my head, but the man returned to the bedroom.

He didn't stop smiling even when he pulled the string to call the maid. I wanted to pinch him because he was so annoying.



The swan profiteroles made by Mrs. Appleby would rival those of high-end restaurants.


As Grace savored the custard shoe elegantly laid out on the bed tray, the man sat leaning against the bed’s headboard, brushing her hair.

There is a high possibility that it won't be able to embrace either way.


"I don't care."


Well, it doesn't matter.


"You just need to be by my side."


She is just a child I made to anchor her by my side. No shipowner cares whether the anchor of the ship is blue or pink.



The hunger that had been there vanished in an instant, and my appetite disappeared. Grace, who had turned to ask for the tray to be removed, froze.

A navy leather box was held in the man's hands. He gazed at Grace's face and then smiled.


"You already seem to know what it is."


Yes, unfortunately. That was obviously a ring box.


Grace suddenly recalled. On his engagement day, this man made her open all the other boxes but secretly hid that one.



What kind of emotion should I portray right now?


While Grace was unable to decide on a direction and was hesitating, the box opened.


Why is that? My heart sank like the moment a man pulled back the hammer of a gun right in front of me.


In the center of the golden cushion was indeed a ring. Moreover, it was an expensive item far beyond Grace's expectations.



Her gaze fell on the brand name written inside the box. It was a jewelry atelier so famous that even someone like her, who was far removed from wealth and luxury, could recognize it.

It is a renowned brand across the continent, where the king ordered the queen's engagement ring. Therefore, that was a luxury item that even a wealthy tycoon would not casually photograph.

The platinum ring, reminiscent of a tiara fit for royalty, was adorned with diamonds without a single gap. Moreover, on the upper part, shaped like a peacock's plume, there was an upside-down teardrop diamond larger than Grace's thumbnail.




So, this was an engagement ring, without a doubt.
The man laughed as if it were nothing to Grace, who looked up at him with surprised eyes.


"My plan, you were curious about it."


The tone was light, but the gaze was incredibly serious.


No. You can't be like this. You, who are more greedy and calculating than anyone else? This doesn't make any sense.



Don't forget. This man is someone who gave you hope and doesn't hesitate to take it away, the man who has mocked you all this time.



Don't be fooled. This is just another trick. In the end, it's nothing more than a fake bait. That man will trap you again. For life.



"Choose one by one. Since they are all mine anyway, if you want them all, there's no need to choose."


Grace gazed down at the photos and blueprints spread out on the sheet, repeating the same words like a mantra.


This is just a bigger prison.


"If you don't like it, just say so. I'll look into other options."


It's disgusting how you act like a merciful savior, taking away all my dreams and freedom.


She had to steady her trembling heart. Grace dropped her gaze to her grotesquely swollen belly and then stared at the face of the man who was still undeniably elegant.

Grace, look closely.


You're in such a miserable state right now, and that man is always as graceful as a swan. Since our first meeting up to now, it's always been this way. It will continue to be like this in the future.

The neck of the swan elegantly inserted into the custard was suddenly broken and eaten by Grace. She chewed the swan thoroughly while murmuring.

Our future is only this.






I never wanted something like this. I don't want that man.


The gaze overlooking the photo of the luxurious penthouse gradually wavered. Then, the moment her eyes landed on the splendid ring on her left hand's ring finger, Grace tightly shut her eyes.

Don't forget. Your goal is to overthrow the corrupt monarchy and ensure that everyone enjoys a more equal and fair world. You are not alive to become a pig of the monarchy and be part of its gang.

She narrowed her eyes and looked down at my body.


Even after enduring such humiliation, you didn't lose your resolve and held on well. Don't be shaken by something so trivial. Grace, you are not a superficial person.

That man is just trying to figure out the location of my lair, you know that well.


What I want, what we want is not this. Do not waver. This is an act of betraying our comrades.


I didn't want to become a vile traitor like Fred and Peter.


Think of Jimmy.


As the weight of the ring placed by another man pressed against her ring finger, Grace thought of her fiancé.


I still couldn't believe Winston's claim that Jimmy instructed me to commit suicide. No, even if it were true, there must have been some unavoidable circumstances for Jimmy.

"I tried hard to find it, but it didn't go well..."


What had happened is that I was trapped in the basement of the annex and I just didn't know.


Moreover, Jimmy was the leader of the revolutionaries. As a leader, there are times when one must make painful decisions. It was undoubtedly a decision made with tears in his eyes.

So, if I return alive, I will be happy.


Between Jimmy and her, there was a camaraderie that transcended romantic love. So, she would not just abandon another man's child, especially one that she had reluctantly conceived while trying to protect her comrades.

Grace squeezed her eyes shut again.



"We aspire to the great cause of making everyone's life equal and prosperous…."
He tilted his head slightly while lifting up the neatly written report, as if he wanted to kiss.


The moment Grace took an unexpected action, his drowsily closed eyes suddenly opened wide. He pulled the tie and pressed his lips together first. To make the crooked tie even more crooked.

"You seem to be in a good mood today."


As the lips fell apart, the man narrowed his eyes and tilted his head to one side.


"Wouldn't it naturally be bad?"


Grace tucked in the protruding tie into the jacket and adjusted the angle of her hand so that the ring was visible.


"When will you show me the penthouse?"


“How about dinner tonight if you’re not tired?”


Grace tried hard to suppress the urge to laugh at the more daring suggestion than expected.


"I'm not tired at all. Then, since it's been a while since we went out, how about a meal? Maybe it's a bit awkward with people around?"



“If you want anything.”


The man pressed his lips against her forehead, which was beaming with a bright smile, and asked.


“How was that cruise last time?”


"Okay. This time, I will make sure your time feels like eight hours, so be prepared."


The man burst out laughing. It was a smile that genuinely seemed happy.


He went out into the hallway only after giving various instructions, insisting that he must dress warmly when going for a walk.



"Leon."


The moment she impulsively called his name, the man stopped in front of the stairs and turned to look at Grace.


"Are you happy?"

The maid, who was about to shake her head and say no, obediently followed her instructions as her gaze fell on the black pistol.



Grace approached the iron gate of the annex with the maid held hostage in front of her. The moment the two guards standing outside heard her footsteps and turned around, she twisted her body to display her gun clearly and demanded.



"Open."


It was amusing to see the two men flustered.


"Right now."


However, whether the bastards were not fools or had been thoroughly trained and instructed, they did not readily open the door.



Ah, that's right.


The life they needed to protect was not this maid, but Grace.


I have to make it so that it has no choice but to open.


"If you don't open it, I'll shoot."


Grace dismissed the maid and turned the gun towards me. Only then did the guys become pale and fumble to open the door.



It's funny.


No one stopped her while she was getting out with the gun aimed under her chin.


It's really funny.


Grace had to hold back the urge to laugh out loud, wanting to mock the entire mansion as she crossed the garden with her bloated stomach.

It didn't take long to safely cross the back gate and escape from this bothersome mansion.


Thus, Grace ran away.



A pair of pale blue eyes watched her disappearing figure beyond the wall from behind a pair of binoculars.
It was unexpected that he had talent. It turns out that acting in love could be so easy.

Leon suddenly became curious. Who will the Best Actor award in this deceit-filled romantic thriller movie ultimately go to?

That woman was quite a formidable competitor. Although she occasionally showed signs of wavering, she performed her role convincingly.

Yeah, it was just acting. But what is this bitter aftertaste?

He could not help but know that meaning, even if he wanted to ignore it.

If I pretend to love her, she might not leave me. It was only when the woman stepped out of the annex with a pistol drawn that I realized I had been unknowingly nurturing such foolish hopes.


Perhaps there was a faint belief that the woman would no longer toy with his heart. How foolish.

Feeling betrayed once again, he stepped outside the building and got into the waiting car. The black sedan that exited the mansion's main gate took a winding route toward the nearest town, Haylwood.


The sedan avoided the main road and drove along a narrow back alley, eventually coming to a stop behind a shabby two-story building. As Campbell opened the door, Leon immediately got out and headed for the first floor of the building.

Inside the shop, which was firmly shut, the soldiers waiting stood up in unison and saluted. Leon cast his gaze at the one with the highest rank among them.

"The operation target arrived at the objective point one minute ago."

As soon as he heard the report, he headed to the window covered with curtains. Peering through a narrow gap, he could see a woman standing across the street at the tram stop.


"Deploy it."

"Yes!"

As soon as Leon gave the command, the private, dressed in civilian clothes and waiting in the corner of the shop, went out the back door. He soon crossed the street and stood at the station.


The woman, standing some distance away, glanced furtively at the unfamiliar young man, unknowingly thinking he might be the soldier following her, and tightened the scarf that wrapped around half of her head and face even more.

Then I kept staring at the end of the road and lingered in the same spot. Seeing them anxious as if someone might be chasing after them, it seemed they did not realize this was a trap.


"Make achievements that no one can criticize. Achievements that will satisfy both the people and the royal family."

Leon recalled the conversation he had with the commander last summer.

"You are talking about the extermination of the base."

"That's already your mission, and I know you are making every effort. But how about this approach?"

I wondered if there was some extraordinary measure he hadn't considered, but there wasn't.

"Act like you're freeing the child and follow them. Of course, they wouldn't just run back home like a fool the moment they're let go. We just need to create a reason that makes it inevitable for them to go there."

"I have also thought about that."

"Then why not use it right away?"

No matter how long the dog is, if you let it go, you might lose it.

Moreover, the road has not become familiar.





The moment Grace escaped outside the mansion wall, she could no longer hold back.

It is today. It is today. Yes, it was today.

I couldn't stop laughing. No, it felt like crying too.

Despite the excited heart, the steps were remarkably calm. It doesn't matter if I walk slowly anyway. No one will come to catch me.

Grace recalled one of the many requests the man had made as he left for work.

"The ground is frozen and slippery. Walk slowly so you don't fall while taking a stroll."

Yeah, right. Don't I listen well? Are you watching closely?

I wondered why you were so affectionate yesterday and today, and it turns out that today is the day the operation begins.

I laughed again.

As Haywood approached, Grace wrapped a scarf around her head and covered her face. It was difficult to encounter someone who recognized Sally Bristol.

I was lucky. The tram that comes once an hour arrived shortly after I had been waiting.

The inside of the tram was quiet, as it was a weekday morning after the rush hour. Grace sat in the corner seat at the very back and finally took out the gun she had been holding in her pocket.


I pulled out the magazine from the pistol and, after racking the slide to check the chamber, I couldn't help but laugh. Both the magazine and the chamber were completely empty.


So that man gave Grace an empty gun.

Moreover, the money in my pocket was only enough to reach the inn in Winsford. It was calculated that if I gave too much money, he might run away alone without seeking help from his companions.


A terribly thorough bastard.

A cold-blooded person who is even willing to use a woman who has a child of her own.

I had already noticed that the man was using the child for his own purposes. However, it was only about a month ago that I realized what he intended to use them for.

As he entered a stable phase, he focused on feeding Grace well and taking her for regular walks. Just like training a military dog.

If you let me go, you know I'll run straight to Jimmy.

Son of a bitch. Cold-hearted. Someone who uses love while pretending to care, a terribly calculating bastard. I hope you clearly see me running away and feel the pain of being abandoned.


Grace gritted her teeth, looking at the city gradually approaching through the car window.

The plans have already been set in various ways. I intend to disappear forever without disclosing the location of the base.

Leon Winston, you're not the only one who can calculate.

I got off in front of the Winsford Opera House and headed straight to the department store. As soon as I stepped inside, Grace paused. The interior was brilliantly decorated with Christmas decorations reaching up to the ceiling.

Suddenly, I thought about how there was an Easter decoration in that spot on the last day I was here. The time I had been trapped felt vividly real all over again.

Nancy momentarily stood there with her mouth slightly open, unable to say anything, then seemed to be searching for a way as she rolled her eyes from side to side and mumbled.


"Returning to the village right now is dangerous."

"I know that too. What I need is money, .45 caliber bullets, and a hideout. If possible, please find a hideout in a big city where there are many immigrants. I'll take care of evading the tracking and getting to the hideout myself."

Grace, who had quickly whispered the plans she set up on her way here, hesitated for a moment and added.

“I’ll go back once this problem is resolved.”

As her gaze fell again on her protruding belly, Nancy let out a long sigh.

"There is a post office across from the department store. Wait in front of the phone booth. I will check first and then contact you."

"No."

Grace urgently grabbed Nancy, who was trying to go inside.

"Don't inform the executives."

The thought of others finding out that I have the enemy's child is humiliating. Just thinking about it makes my hands tremble.

Nancy stared at Grace's desperate face for a moment, then let out a short sigh and asked.

“Ammo, funds, safe house. With these three, is that enough?”

"That's right."

"I understand, so I will be waiting at the post office."

The post office was also bustling due to the approaching Christmas. Grace sat on a bench near the row of telephone booths and secretly glanced across the lobby.

In the distance, a young man was sitting cross-legged on a bench, reading a newspaper.

Son of a bitch. Do you think I would let myself be used willingly?

Grace repeatedly went over her plan in her mind. First, she would hint to Nancy that she had been discovered after receiving what she needed from her. Then, she would leave immediately and head to the train station.

Shall we first get the train schedule and then find a suitably shabby hotel to stay in?

Anyway, even if we dawdle for a day, those guys will just watch us quietly. So I thought it might be a good idea to hide in the hotel, take a short break, and plan the escape operation a bit more thoroughly.


Ah, but does it stand out too much that I've realized being too leisurely can be a trap?

Grace let out a deep sigh and rummaged through her pockets. She was hungry since lunchtime had passed. As she gathered up her spare change to buy something to eat, she found the most expensive item in her pocket that would not provide any immediate cash.

I wonder what she was thinking when she gave me the engagement ring.

It was still a question. It's too expensive to simply be bait.

I suddenly thought such a thing. Perhaps the man gave this object in the hope that Grace would choose him instead of freedom at the crossroads he proposed.

Suddenly, hunger disappeared. She stopped rummaging through her pockets and gazed quietly down at her shoe tip.

It was all an act of pretending to love, and now it's probably been revealed. If caught again, I will be trapped once more. The future that man promised may have already turned into a blank slate.

I do not know what Jimmy meant by those words. It simply sounded to Grace like a statement that she had lost the right to stand shoulder to shoulder with her comrades because she was carrying the enemy's child.

"Is this the way you care for me? Is it just throwing me away with this measly amount?"

Grace pulled out the bundle of banknotes she had kept in her pocket and shook it while complaining.

“I have lived my whole life only for the cause. The revolutionary army is my family. How could Jimmy know that….”

“Phew…. Please calm down, Grace. Jimmy couldn't help it….”

Grace interrupted Nancy and asked.

“What did Jimmy say when he found out I was caught?”

"I don’t know how I could have. At that time, I was out of my mind preparing for Fred's funeral."

“…What? Fred is dead?”

"Wow, didn't you know?"

While Grace was in a daze after hearing nothing from that man except that he had released Fred, Nancy told Fred what had happened with a face holding back tears.

"Do you know that my family still hasn't been able to escape from pain? My younger brother was not only brutally tortured but also died in a horrific way that I can't even bear to see open-eyed..."


Grace, who had been at a loss for words and just listening, suddenly became alert at Nancy's added remark as she bit her lip tightly.

"However, I don't understand how you're alive."

"What does that mean?"

"You escaped without a single injury."

"What?"

Could it be that they think Winston sent a double agent? Maybe that's why they are trying to discard it.

Whether he was a double agent or not, if Winston had set a trap and deliberately let it out, Jimmy and Nancy could only be right. However, Grace instinctively kept that fact hidden. She might not just have been discarding it but trying to remove it permanently.

"I'm not Winston's spy!"

Nancy's expression only became more distorted at Grace's protest. The moment Grace saw the private resentment in Nancy's face, which was trying to suppress the urge to burst into anger, she realized.


“Wait, do you really think that I handed Fred over to Winston?”

"Two out of the three assigned to Haywood are dead. You're the only one left. And you're not just fine; you're more than fine. Someone who doesn't know would think you're the wife of a wealthy tycoon."


Eyes filled with scorn scanned Grace from head to toe. Just by looking at her healthy complexion, Winston's expensive wool coat, and the shoes adorned with a gold logo of a famous boutique, one would not perceive her as someone who had been locked in a torture chamber and treated worse than a beast.

That son of a bitch, I was wondering why he only dresses in expensive things.

"Does this look okay?"

With trembling hands, I pointed to my stomach, but Nancy's gaze only grew colder.

“It's truly impressive that you succeeded in tempting Winston, who is famous for not falling for charms. I don't even want to imagine what you had to do to survive. I just feel sorry for my younger sibling, who genuinely liked you.”

In the moment I think of having no family to embrace me, being wrongfully branded as a traitor and ultimately being abandoned, something within Grace suddenly snapped.

"Did your brother die in agony?"

Seeing the pain welling up in Nancy's eyes, Grace smiled with a sly grin.

"I hope it was like that."

One hand that was gripping the collar suddenly let go and flew toward Grace's cheek.

“Ugh….”

But it was Nancy, not Grace, who let out a groan of pain. She chuckled softly while gripping Nancy's wrist tightly.

"Let go, ugh, let go of this!"

I thought I had become weaker living in confinement. Thanks to the daily struggles with that man, my grip strength has improved. It's truly astonishing.

Grace brushed off even the hand that gripped her collar and pushed Nancy back.

"Get lost. I have no business with you anymore."

But Nancy grabbed Grace's wrist as she picked up the receiver without leaving the booth.

"Don't think about calling or going to Jimmy. Go to Joe right now."

Grace aimed a loaded pistol at Nancy, who was trying to take the receiver away.

"I said to turn it off. Right now."

Now the two began to glare at each other with eyes that saw not a comrade but an enemy. It occurred to me that Nancy might try to eliminate me. However, if I made it so that she had no time for such actions, that would be enough.

"Ah, you know? The moment your younger sibling stupidly went to Winsford, they were caught."

As expected. Nancy's face became contemplative.

"If you don't want to end up looking like this after being caught, it would be best to get out of here right now. Think carefully. Would a traitor say something like this?"

And as expected, Nancy put down the receiver immediately and disappeared outside the booth like a person being chased, and then promptly vanished outside the post office.


As Nancy's curse, which had become as vicious as the vampire of Camden, still lingered like a ghost in the cramped booth, Grace began to make a phone call.

"Braeton's Crawford number 1499... Ah, my name is...."

What was conveyed to the exchange person was Nancy's alias, not her own. It was because she thought that if he knew it was her, Jimmy might avoid the call.

[What happened?]

"Jimmy, it's me."

Was that thought correct? After hearing Grace's voice, Jimmy was momentarily silent. It was the same for Grace; despite hearing her fiancé's voice after a long time, another emotion arose before the joy of seeing him again.

"I want to ask you something."

Before she spoke again, Grace tightly shut her eyes. In the darkness, Winston's painfully pitiful face flickered before her.

"Your fiancé instructed you to commit suicide."

[To be honest…]

Jimmy lowered his voice and whispered.

[That was the elders' decision. That you know too much....]

"I didn't reveal anything while I was locked up for eight months! I didn't betray Fred and Peter. That was something Fred did!"

[I know that. I know too, Grace… Please don’t cry.]

"Black…."

Even if he said he knew the truth, it was of no comfort at all.

[Please believe me. I regret it too. Still, I can't express how happy I am that you have come back to life like this….]

"Yeah, I'm happy, but I can't accept having that kid's child. Right?"

[Ha… I didn't mean that.]

"Do you know why I ended up like this? Because I didn't waver! And yet, how could you do this to me! Without even trying to help! I barely managed to get out on my own, and now you abandon me?"


[I told you it's not about throwing it away!]

"Then is our engagement still valid?"

As the silence continued on the other end of the receiver, Grace couldn't hold back.

"Sniff…."

She began to feel pathetic for feeling guilty about Jimmy in Winston's arms.

As Grace buried her face in one hand and began to spill out her sorrow, the man whispered as if he felt sorry for her in her mind.

"I don't understand what you like about such an irresponsible man that you promised to marry him. Miss Riddle, you look pathetic."

Shut up, Winston. Please, shut up.

[Grace, I have something I need to do as the head of the family....]

"Enough. I don't want to hear any more."

The longer the excuses, the more miserable my abandoned situation became.

[I’m really sorry. Ha… I’m also pained that things have come to this.]

Would you suffer as much as I do?

As he bit his lip, Jimmy, who had almost kept his mouth shut until now, suddenly began to chatter like someone who wanted to end the call quickly.

[I will organize your belongings and money and send them to you at an appropriate time. If you need funds, I can arrange them for you anytime, so don’t hesitate to reach out. Grace, I too am troubled that our paths have crossed like this. But rather than you coming back and being used again…]

At the words that she might be used when she goes back, Grace snapped to attention.

Does that mean you will use it to capture Winston again? However, it is impossible to reinstate Grace as a spy.

Then as bait?

"Ma'am, how far are you going?"

Was it because the pregnant woman looked pitiful with tearful eyes and a lost expression? The train attendant, with an exaggeratedly cheerful demeanor, took the crumpled paper bag and guided her to first class.

Grace was someone who, under normal circumstances, wouldn't seek help from others for things she could do on her own. However, at this moment, she felt a desire to rely on the kindness of a stranger and willingly followed along.

The station attendant opened the door of a passenger cabin with the number 1 written large on it and politely extended a hand. After being treated as a lady and sitting in her seat, the station attendant placed an envelope beside her.

"Thank you."

"I'm happier to be able to help you."

The man slightly lifted the brim of his hat and greeted.

"I hope you have a Christmas filled with happiness and love."

Has there ever been a time when holiday greetings sounded so empty? Her Christmas was already stained with sorrow and betrayal.

The moment I forcibly pulled up the corners of my mouth to smile, the cabin door closed.

“Ha….”

A deep sigh immediately echoed through the elegantly decorated six-person room, monotonous yet luxurious.

Grace kept stroking her stomach, which felt tight and tense the whole way to the train station.

‘Is this child having a hard time too?’

There were frequent stirrings.

Grace took off her shoes. She leaned her back against the wall towards the hallway and sat down on the long seat, stretching her legs. Sitting in the cushy spot made her body comfortable quickly, but her mind was not the same.

She took a deep breath, gazing at the bustling platform with unfocused eyes. She tried to compose herself, but occasionally failed and felt her shoulders shake.

I couldn't truly believe, despite vividly experiencing it, that people with whom I grew up like brothers could change so coldly compared to others.

Suddenly, once again, a stirring was felt.

As I sighed deeply and stroked my belly, the tear droplets tangled in the crimson sweater soaked my hand.

Grace smiled unknowingly. It was a chuckle that sounded like a sigh.

Should I be thankful to this child, whom I found unpleasant? If I hadn't had a child, I might have never known their true nature forever.

Even if she wanted to blame Winston, the mastermind behind all this betrayal, she couldn't. No matter what influence he had, the ultimate decision to abandon her was made by Jimmy.


Intuition kept whispering. There was more to the reason Jimmy was trying to abandon her than just personal feelings.

The Blanchard Revolutionary Army never abandons its captured comrades. Grace has believed that promise and fearlessly dove into dangerous operations all this time.

However, I broke the promise I had kept to the other comrades from the very beginning with her.

"He has said several times that he never came to save you."

"Your fiancé instructed you to commit suicide."

Grace stared blankly down at the box of chocolate she had been holding. There was no price written on it, but it looked quite expensive.

Grace held the box up to her nose and laughed. She faintly caught the scent of the man's perfume from the corner.

She opened the box, put a chocolate in her mouth, and smiled at Mrs. Baker. Thank you was certainly unnecessary.

I knew it would be like this.

The maid? It must be a soldier.

It was actually suspicious from the lobby of the train station. As Grace stood at the end of the ticket counter line, someone who had been standing next to the convenience store approached, their stride and walking rhythm perfectly even, as if trained in their movements.

Moreover, someone who is going back to their hometown after a long time is only carrying a handbag without any gifts or a large suitcase. Of course, it may be optimal for a tailing operation, but isn't it too careless to deceive the target of the operation?

Mrs. Baker asked with a kind smile, unaware of Grace's true feelings.

"Is this your first child?"

"Yes, that's right."

"I also remember when I had my first child…."

"It's both thrilling and scary."

Grace intentionally smiled and acted friendly.

"Is it true that it hurts incredibly when giving birth?"

“Um… it hurts. It does hurt, but the joy is so overwhelming…”

Moreover, I acted somewhat foolishly. To make the opponent let their guard down.

"I wonder if it’s not too hard for you. Even if you’re not at full term yet, traveling far with that body isn’t an easy task."

"That's right. My stomach keeps feeling tight and uncomfortable today, and I'm a bit worried."

In fact, the stomach had been fine for a long time.

The woman's complexion darkened in an instant, and she asked various things, wondering if blood was showing through her underwear and if she could feel any movements.

"Then it must be temporary due to tiredness. You should take it easy and get some rest..."

Even in the woman's questions and advice, there was a peculiar scent of expertise.

As expected, she is a nurse officer. I threw out the bait since a woman of her age is usually a nurse officer still in the military, and she bit right away.

That man, could he possibly be somewhere on this train?

Suddenly thinking of something, Grace rejected the woman's suggestion to lie down comfortably in the seat and stood up.

"I need to use the restroom..."

Grace, who had come out into the hallway without thinking, hesitated.

What will you do if we run into each other?

When I scan the carriage from end to end, it will really become awkward for both of us the moment I make eye contact with Winston.

I acted politely, but deep down I was only thinking it was bothersome.

Even when changing trains, you'll probably continue to follow me as if you know me, right? You might even be a nuisance when we arrive at our destination.

Moreover, there might have been others following her in addition to the person closely monitoring her like that woman.

I became alert at the thought that someone might eavesdrop on the very private conversation that would take place tonight, a conversation that the enemy must not know about.


Looking into plans beyond that, it was something that had to be done eventually to throw off those who were following them. In the end, Grace decided to stop pretending that she was unaware of the man's scheme at this point.

"Mrs. Baker, what time is it now?"

The woman looked at her wristwatch and replied.

"It's 4:28."

This train arrives at Chesterfield, the gateway of the central region where the tracks from east, west, south, and north intersect, at 4:30 PM and departs again at 4:35 PM.

There have been no delays so far.

Perhaps it meant that there were only 2 minutes left to carry out the operation that had been set in motion since Winsford Central Station. Grace got up.

“Also, the restroom a bit….”

"When you have a child, signals often come frequently."

The woman smiled kindly. Grace, who had smiled back in the same way, wiped the smile off her face as soon as she stepped into the hallway.

First, I headed to the right where the restroom was located. Pretending to wait for my turn, I sat on a makeshift chair and just stared at the door leading outside.

Before long, the train slowed down and entered Chesterfield station. Grace, who had only been looking at the platform, unconsciously turned her head and glanced at the opposite track, and a good idea suddenly struck her.

"This might be better."

A train was stopped on the adjacent track.

It seemed that the train would be less likely to notice the trap than the platform. Moreover, the side of the platform had many doors opening from the train, and the comings and goings were too easily visible at a glance, which was a drawback.

It seems that Chesterfield is the starting point; the other trains were sparsely empty, and porters wearing round, flat hats were boarding the train.

It meant that there was time until departure.

However, the time allotted for this train is 5 minutes. In other words, the operation time was only 5 minutes.

As soon as the train came to a stop, Grace stood up and opened the door. She happened to make eye contact with a porter beyond the closed door of the adjacent train.

When she gestured for him to open it, the man, appearing puzzled, immediately opened the door for her.

The gap between the trains was not narrow, but it was a distance she could easily jump over on her own. Still, there was no need to push herself. Grace took the hand that the porter kindly offered and hopped over to the adjacent train.

As soon as Grace entered the hallway, she handed a bill to the porter. The man’s eyes widened when he saw the amount.

"While standing on the platform, when people rush out and ask where the pregnant woman went, I say over there...."

She pointed to the postal train on the opposite platform.

"Please tell me that I jumped into that train."

"Yes, just leave it to me."

changed from gray to blue, but there were no sounds in the hallway searching for her. This meant that there were no pursuers back on this train.

Only then did Grace return to the empty guest room.

"It can't be right to have an uninvited guest on Christmas, when the whole family gathers."

She took a bottle of soda out of the bag, opened the cap, and sat down with her legs stretched out. Enjoying the breathtaking scenery of the Chesterfield River outside the window and her newfound freedom, Grace suddenly burst into laughter.

It felt like a thrilling exhilaration, as if I had successfully taken on a mission after a long time.

I thought I had become sluggish in body and mind from living confined without any special stimulation.

"Wow, I'm still usable, right?"

However, the refreshing laughter soon faded.

I'm still able to write like this….







An office overlooking the platform of Chesterfield Central Station, shrouded in darkness and silence, resembled a daytime train station.

In this place where a temporary operations headquarters had been set up, the sound of a dozen soldiers talking on the phone was incessant. They all repeated the same words like parrots.


"Yes, is there an assistant manager or station staff who has seen a pregnant woman with brown hair, teal eyes, and a light brown coat?"

I was calling stations all over the country, trying to track down the train that the target had boarded, but there had been no significant results for several hours.

Outside, the soldiers mobilized by the Central Command were searching the train station and the city late into the night. All to find just one woman.

Most of the personnel urgently deployed for this operation did not know the identity of that woman at all. They only heard that she was a recently arrested person of interest, who was believed to possess important confidential information regarding the rebels.

The moment the door burst open, the noise that had been deafening suddenly stopped. Everyone stopped what they were doing and stood up to salute in unison, but that polite behavior only displeased the commander.

"Seeing that you have the leisure to stand up, it seems you found Bella who ran away."

As everyone's face turned ashen, the captain coldly turned his body and headed towards the conference room. Amid the voices frantically inquiring about the woman's whereabouts, the captain issued a directive to Campbell.

"Please call Lieutenant McGill."

"Yes."

Campbell conveyed the instructions to the waiting private and beckoned with his fingertips toward a familiar face sitting at a desk. The private, who had been responsible for following the woman from Halewood to Winsford, immediately stood up from his seat and ran over to him.

"How about Nancy Wilkins?"

He mentioned the real name of the rebel he learned by eavesdropping on the woman's conversation. When asked if he had any information about Wilkins's whereabouts, the private's face grew dark.


"Up to now, there is no new information received."

I informed my colleague about how Grace Lee had caught on to the fact that we were monitoring the Winsford base. And Wilkins managed to completely shake off the tail that was following me and disappeared.


"Then what about the side of Croford?"
The captain, who had been staring at the blackboard, turned his head this way. In that moment, Lieutenant McGill knew he shouldn’t avoid his superior’s gaze, but he flinched and turned his eyes away.


The afterimage left by the fleeting moment was intense. The sharp, bright blue eyes that glimmered in the shadow cast by Jungmo continued to flicker in front of me.

A long-closed path to promotion may open due to a mistake made long ago, and it has now been three months since I participated in this operation. During that time, the lieutenant, who had only seen rigid and rude superiors, thought that there could be no soldier as mismatched with the military as Captain Winston, with his refined appearance and dignified demeanor.


However, the moment the operation began, he transformed into a soldier more rigid than anyone else.

And now, I began to fear that he might not transform into the vampire Camden, which I had certainly believed was an exaggeration.

"Close the door."

The lieutenant stepped inside and closed the door, taking a deep breath. When she turned around again, the captain was now completely turned towards her, looking at her as if to interrogate.


The meeting room started to feel like an interrogation room.

When the situation was first reported, the captain exuded a tense atmosphere, but instead of reprimanding the surveillance team, he focused immediately on directing the revised operation.


So perhaps I was called to face the reprimand that had been postponed. The feeling of pressure made it hard to breathe. It was a moment when cold sweat ran down my back.


"Lieutenant McGill."

"Yes, Captain."

“Report thoroughly on the conversation you had with the target of the operation.”

The lieutenant reported the conversation he had with the woman, making an effort to remember every expression and word. Then, at some point, the captain's brows furrowed. It was then that she started to vaguely realize where she had made a mistake.

Leon let out a weary sigh.

The mistake was writing as a nursing officer. Although I underwent intense training for the past three months, the lack of field experience led to mistakes at such a crucial moment.


Leon did not have many options. Female soldiers are rare. And most of the usable personnel were guarding the interrogation room, so there was a high possibility that the woman would recognize the voice.

Among the few candidates, I left only the impression and age group that would make that woman feel less guarded, and when I selected a nursing officer in case the woman's condition worsened, I made such a mistake.

“Didn’t I clearly say? That woman is very perceptive, so be careful with your words and actions. Where on earth did she hear that?”

"I'm sorry."

"After watching, continue."

"Yes, after that I asked if it was her first child, and the woman said yes, feeling both excited and scared..."

Leon couldn't hold back a chuckle.

I'm excited to have a child, Rani.

She only pretended to have given up, but the woman, who still did not welcome the child, went so far as to tell unnecessary lies while playing the role of a harmless and ordinary woman.


That woman knew this was a trap.


When did I first know? Was it because of the lieutenant's slip of the tongue? Perhaps even before that….
As if nothing had happened, the hand that had slid into the inside of the jacket stopped again. Leon let out a long sigh.

It had become a habit to smoke a cigar when feeling suffocated. But ever since that woman started experiencing nausea every time she smelled a cigar, she got rid of the cigar case.


Instead, I went to the window and opened it wide. No matter how much I inhaled the cold night air, the boiling anger and anxiety did not subside.

A passage I read in a book kept swirling in my mind. Was it said that a tightening of the stomach can be caused by emotional shock?

Leon gritted his teeth as he recalled the little rodents that had shocked the woman.

I appreciate you going along with my calculations, but you should have moderated it.

Soon, the father of the child on that ship will personally experience that he is a human who knows nothing of moderation.

Despite receiving repeated assurances from the doctor that she was healthy, the woman hesitated to launch the operation until the very last moment.

After watching her wilt and wither, Léon lost the illusion that no matter what he did, the woman would not be broken. He had also long since discarded the illusion that he wanted her to be broken.


However, in the end, they pushed through with the operation. A drastic measure was necessary.

If left as is, there is no future between him and the woman. Even if he immediately discards the remnants of hatred and changes, the woman, caught in futile beliefs, will not change. They could not spend their entire lives merely going around in the same wheel of love and hate.

Leon tried to look into that woman's mind, which was like the distant darkness beyond the window.

I obtained escape funds and weapons from a comrade. Since I am watching, they don’t go to the base. So I took a train heading to my brother, but I managed to shake off the observer in the middle.


There are two options here.

One, I'm going to the base.

What could be the reason for going there even after being betrayed?

Regret? Revenge?

If you want to take revenge on that guy, use me. Don't think of doing it alone.

For now, we are tracking the trains heading towards Brayton, but there have been no reports of sightings of the woman for several hours.

If so, the second option heads toward a third position.

It was the worst case for Leon. The one woman he knows has no other ties. If the woman hides in a place where she has no connections, he may have to search the entire kingdom, no, perhaps the whole continent, like looking for a needle in a haystack.

The only clue he could believe in was her eyes, which could not be changed regardless of any effort she made.

The moment the teal eyes, which revealed numerous emotions under him last night, came to mind, Leon roughly swept his face. An unpredictable woman. Last night's poignant time felt so frustrating that it seemed like a dream.

Where to. Where on earth.

As Leon was pondering over the events that had unfolded today, dissecting them in chronological order while looking down at the platform where the woman had vanished, he suddenly looked up.


No, that's not right. There are three options.

He opened the door and came out, and commanded.

"Contact the original train that the woman was on, at the original terminal right away! Campbell, instruct the surveillance personnel at Redhill Farm to immediately resume the follow on Jonathan Riddle Jr."

"You sit too..."

The moment his gaze, drifting upwards, brushed Grace's belly, it stopped.

“Oh my god, what has happened to you all this time? Is it Jimmy's baby? When did you get married without saying anything? This is quite upsetting. Wait. Did you come alone? Is someone who is pregnant wandering around alone on a cold night? Oh, this is not good. Let's go home right now. Have you eaten dinner?”

Jo, completely unaware of the situation, struggled to understand it alone and stood up, grabbing Grace.

"This will be talked about later."

She sat down across from her older brother, placing him back in his seat.

"I have something I want to ask instead."

Knowing her younger sibling's stubbornness well, Jo gave up and nodded. Grace inhaled with a determined look on her face and sighed as she asked.

"Am I really my father's biological child?"

You already know everything and are just asking. Jo opened the mouth that had been tightly shut.

But the answer did not come readily. Even though I had practiced countless times in my head, expecting this day to come, when it actually arrived, the words wouldn't come off the tip of my tongue.


"Please answer honestly."

Jo eventually shook his head with difficulty. Immediately, his younger sibling's face became a crying expression, as if trying to hold back tears.

“…Your biological father is someone else.”

I see. In the end, Winston was right. Grace swallowed her rising tears and vaguely nodded her head.

"I don't know who I am either. I'm sorry."

I already know that. It was something I couldn't bring myself to say.

“Then do you know how you… came to have me?”

Still, I couldn't believe Winston's words that I was merely a product of a dirty beauty scheme, and when I asked, the expression of anguish on my brother's face deepened.

"Even I, while drunk, find it hard to talk about this, but you, in your right mind…."

He buried his face in his hands and let out a deep sigh before getting up from his seat.

"I can't bring myself to say this. Please tell my mother."

In his hand, my brother, who had returned home, was holding an old diary and a faded letter envelope. He handed the diary to Grace and then went back outside.

As the sound of striking matches and swearing softly echoed outside while someone was smoking, Grace opened her journal with the feeling of digging up the grave of her long-deceased mother and lifting the coffin lid.

The beginning was ordinary. There were only trivial stories about her newlywed life with her stepfather, Jonathan 'Johnny' Reed.

However, at some point, writings criticizing the world's unfairness and monarchies began to emerge little by little, followed by texts that clearly outlined the goals and dedication to achieve a greater cause.


Grace, who quickly turned the pages that were no different from my diary, suddenly halted her hand.

"At first, I thought it was just a simple infiltration mission, but Johnny keeps making more demands. When the higher-ups say they need to set an example, I don’t know what to do. Oh God, is this really the right path?"

"While it still makes me sick to have to cater to the dirty royalists and play the role of the government, I can endure it if I think that my sacrifice will ultimately lead to their

Is that really possible?

Johnny said that it would be fine to hide everything thoroughly and teach, but to my ears, that sounded like "brainwashing."

The child who had hoped to make more friends at school is unfortunate. The authorities were wary of the child stepping outside of their control. They did not allow the child to go to a real school, saying that inappropriate information should not be injected from outsiders before the child was 'complete.'

What can this little kid say? It feels as if I'm dealing with a secret weapon; it's ridiculous.

In the end, the monsters were not the children, but them.

"I absolutely do not want the children to know what I do. I'm especially worried that if Grace finds out while she is still very young, she might come to see it as just something that female comrades naturally do."

I wish it had been a boy. Or at least, it should have had an unpleasant appearance.

"When do they plan to keep a child who is already eleven years old confined to the village?"

I insisted on bringing Grace along for this operation with the team. I argued that she should know about the outside world as well. I questioned what use there is for a fool who doesn’t even know how to ride a train. This time, I was able to persuade them.

That said, seeing that you are excited about your first trip without knowing anything makes me uncomfortable.

In fact, that's how I feel. I wish that child would just disappear like this. I hope some kind-hearted family vacationing at Abington Beach would take that child away.

Somehow, that child seems like they will face the same fate as me, and I am increasingly anxious.

"Taking her to Abington Beach was definitely a mistake. I never thought it would end up like this...."

Grace has changed. Blindly. It makes my heart feel heavy, like the look in my eyes when I first set foot here following a monster named Jonathan Lindley.

"I might now be a monster just like everyone else. My face in the mirror, covered in makeup, cannot look that ugly."

It seems that Blanchard has finally told his son what I do. That kid was staring at me with a strange look today, and it made me feel uncomfortable.

I fear that my children will find out. What will they think of me then?

Grace is only fourteen years old. But that devil took her out on a mission and made her shoot someone to death. While the child was away, Johnny drunkenly laughed with delight, saying that a piglet killed a piglet.

Disgusting.

"Grace, please. He will never be a good man."

"Damn it. Johnny gave Grace lipstick on her birthday. A bright red lipstick that a whore would wear."

I will kill you.

"The devil has finally died! Hahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahah!"


I can't see it anymore, so I covered it up.

"Yeah, I felt the same way when I first saw that diary."

Grace struggled to lift her head. In the doorway where the cold wind blew, Jo roughly threw a cigarette butt on the floor and stepped on it.

Grace, who had been staring blankly into space, suddenly stood up. She herself did not understand why she had suddenly risen. Rubbing her goosebumps on her arms, she covered her mouth to stifle a sudden urge to vomit, and then, cradling her distorted face with both hands, she just paced in front of the table as if she had lost her mind.

So many emotions surged all at once, and it felt as though they all canceled each other out. Reason returned before the sense of numbness did.

"Ah, so that was it. I thought you had betrayed your ideals and comrades because you fell in love..."

I misunderstood and was disappointed, thinking that my brother had succumbed to the ugly reality. Grace could no longer speak.

"Yeah, so you couldn't take me with you. Do you still remember?"

"...Right."

Grace vividly remembered how emotional she had been when he said he would leave with his lover, Martha, blaming him.

Realizing how stupid he was, countless emotions surged and tangled inside him. Now, not just his hands but his whole body trembled.

"I thought about telling you the truth, but I felt that I had to wait until you doubted it to some extent on your own."

"Of all people, my fiancé was Jimmy."

Jo nodded.

"I thought that if you knew, you would convey all of this to Jimmy as it is. Then we would either lose the inheritance that our mother left us with great difficulty to Blanchard's group and live as captives for life, or, if we were unlucky, we would be eliminated."

Grace looked up and gazed at the group with a puzzled expression.

“And you thought that by giving him the inheritance, he would use it as funds for Jimmy.”

"Heritage?"

Jo rummaged through the inner pocket of the old coat and handed over something. It was the envelope he had brought along with the diary a little while ago.

“Father, no. After Jonathan Riddle, that devil, died, Mother found and hid the fortune that his child concealed. For us.”

Grace urgently tore open the letter. As she unfolded the neatly creased paper, her hands began to tremble more as time went on.

"Grace...."

Jo, watching his younger sibling with wide-open eyes and clenched lips, approached and placed a hand on his shoulder. The comforting touch carried a sense of regret and sympathy.


"I'm fine."

Saying it's okay with a trembling voice. There could be no words less trustworthy than this.

"It can't be okay. I remember feeling like the world was crumbling beneath my feet back then, but you must feel even more so. Of all times…."

The gaze of Jo landed on Grace's belly. He let out a long sigh and mumbled, cursing, that he should have just said it back then.

“Grace.”

He asked her, as she continued to read the letter.

"Are you going to leave Jimmy?"

It was a question filled with a desperate wish for her to leave. When Grace nodded, he let out a sigh of relief.

In truth, I couldn't bring myself to say that I wasn't leaving but had already been abandoned. However, I couldn't hide it forever.

"What do you think the child will do?"

"This child is not Jimmy's child."

“Captain Leon Winston of the Western Command Intelligence Bureau will come to find you within a month at the latest.”

Upon hearing that infamous name, Jo became lost in thought.

"Be honest and say that I came looking for you. There's no need to get into trouble by lying to him. He probably already knows everything anyway."

Because he knows better than I do.

"When everything is over, we will meet then across the sea."

Grace said goodbye with an eager smile.







To Grace.

By the time you read this letter, I will have already left this world.

I want to first say that I'm sorry for leaving you with this pain while fleeing from the subject of suffering.

The truth is, I still lack confidence. When I think about the shock you will receive upon knowing the truth, I wonder if this is the right thing to do. Even so, keeping you in the clutches of those people is, in any way I think about it, the wrong thing to do, and that's why I muster the courage to speak up.

I have written down where my diary is hidden in the letter I left for Jo, so ask that child. The truth you need to know is inside.

To think that I have used every means to hide my flaws from you, and now I must reveal them myself. I am so ashamed that I cannot raise my face.

I always wanted to remain a wonderful and admirable person to you. However, in order for you to open your eyes and see the truth, it would be necessary to shatter that illusion first.


Grace, I am not a hero who saves the world, but just a cowardly fool.

I regret the time when I hated and struggled with you, who were innocent. After that time passed, I wanted to show you affection, but I couldn’t because I was afraid of the eyes of those around me. I was foolish.

I should have corrected it long ago, and it's truly cowardly that I didn't tell you the truth until you became an adult.

Every time I reflect on my past, I realize that just growing older doesn't make me an adult.

Grace, no matter what you think, you are not at fault. I'm sorry. I'm really sorry.

Please take good care of your body. Don't carelessly offer it to those filthy bastards.

Don't ever expect that the demons will be thankful for your "sacrifice." To them, you are just a means to an end.

So please, please leave.

So don't think about looking for who your father is. I'm worried it will only hurt you more.

Just consider the past as the past and live your life.

Although I am a wretched human who does not even deserve to be called a mother, I want to help you to leave all of this behind and live solely for your happiness.

Go to the capital. There is a safe at the Royal Heritage Bank's main branch in the name listed on your birth certificate. Find the items in there.

That doesn't mean I'm trying to cover up the mistakes I've made with money. I just hope that it can serve as a foundation for you to leave there and start a new life.

What did I bleed for? Mother, that orphan who died in the camp, and the countless nameless women. For what and whose ideal did we all bleed?

The noble ideals and the brotherhood thicker than blood were all illusions. The world in which I was born and lived my whole life, the world that Grace uniquely knew, was all an illusion.


The bird opened its eyes. As it faced a world built on lies and hypocrisy, all the contradictions that had been overlooked began to become clear. It was a crack.

“Sniff….”

Amidst the sound of dragging feet, a sob that was occasionally heard gradually grew longer and transformed into a cry filled with pain.

Birth involves pain and destruction. A bird can only be born by breaking through its own egg.

"Everyone fall into hell!"

The scream of a woman who has resolved to tear down her world with her own hands and be reborn shattered the silence of the night.







On the morning before Christmas, the Chesterfield temporary operation headquarters had a much calmer atmosphere than the night before.

The ringing of the phone and the voice asking about the woman's whereabouts continued as usual, but thanks to the narrowed tracking range, the frequency decreased.

But the taut tension remained.

Campbell, while organizing matters to report to the Western Command, suddenly cast his gaze toward the superior standing by the window. The captain had taken off his jacket and was rolling up the sleeves of his shirt.

Like trying to torture someone.

A list of people he would want to hang upside down passed through Campbell's mind in a flash. However, the one being tortured right now is the captain.

He still looked imposing yet precarious.

The captain stayed up all night guarding this office, acting as if he wouldn't eat or sleep until he found the woman.

Then in the morning, I probably stopped by the hotel for a moment to take a shower, shave, and change my clothes....

Campbell stared at the collar of his superior's shirt with a puzzled expression.

So, he must have changed his clothes, but the crooked knot of his tie was the same.

A captain who is obsessive enough to set strict rules about his attire wouldn't wear a tie that way again. This means that when he took off his clothes, he lightly pulled the string to loosen the loop, and when he put it back on, it was as if he had caught a noose around his neck and tightened the knot.

Is that woman's work, by any chance?

Campbell squinted his eyes.

Before running away, she sets a trap and leaves. What a terrible woman.

Dozens of soldiers were stationed at a total of eight platforms, having received the woman's description and clothing details.

Even after letting people go, Leon remained unable to leave the window where he could overlook all the platforms at a glance.

The train she took, and the local train heading to where Jonathan Lee lives, plus the transfer station and final stop. As a result of thorough investigation, his assumption was correct.


A conductor testified that he saw a woman on the train. The stationmaster of the countryside station closest to Redhill Farm also said he saw a pregnant woman, wearing an

menacing.

It's moving according to my predictions.

The woman looked no different from yesterday. Yet, the feeling that something had changed might have been Mackill's illusion.

As she sat down nonchalantly, the woman turned her gaze, which had been fixed on the platform, toward her.

"Good to see you again, Mrs. Baker."

The woman greeted her with a cheerful voice and a smile, but for some reason, it sent a chill down her spine. At the moment McGilly shyly smiled in response, the woman stood up and moved away.


It wasn't running away. The woman rather walked leisurely as if guiding her somewhere.

The place they arrived at was Platform 3, where the train heading north departs. The woman entered the waiting room in the middle of the platform and sat down.

Grace looked up at Winston's minion and took a deep breath. Jimmy's voice had been echoing in her head since a little while ago.

"If you come back and get used again..."

I'm willing to be used. At least I'll decide who gets to use me.

She broke the silence she had kept through eight months of suffering, smiling with her eyes curved in a wide grin.

"I am going to Blackburn. It's my hometown in Brearton County, a rural village with less than 300 residents. I need to get off at Witheridge Station, so could you wake me up if I fall asleep?"


"Well, let's do that."

McGill responded dazedly and turned around. He went outside the waiting room, glanced at the soldier standing at the entrance to signal him to watch the woman, and then returned to the makeshift command post.

“The location of the base is Blackburn, a town near Witheridge Station in Brattonshire. The size of the enemy is up to 300 people.”

As soon as McGill reported, the temporary command post fully began preparations for the rebel suppression operation.

"Bring the map!"

At Campbell's shout, the soldiers took down the large map that was hanging on the wall and spread it out on the table in the conference room. Soon, a flag symbolizing the operational area was planted in the middle of a forest in the North, surrounded by rivers and mountains, marking a small village.

"The train to Wetheridge will depart in 43 minutes."

When a private checked the train schedule and reported, Leon asked.

“Arrival time.”

"Arriving at Witheridge Station at 16:28."

The time given for the first phase of mission preparation was 43 minutes, and there were approximately 6 and a half hours remaining until the start of the eradication operation.


Leon continued to issue instructions without stopping.

"Campbell."

"Yes."

"Call Chesterfield Air Force Base right now. Arrange to procure a transport plane that can carry about three people."

As the mission commander, he had to arrive at the operation site before the woman. To do so, there was no choice but to use the air route.

And in the meantime, Grace saw a girl. When she caught sight of an eleven-year-old girl, excitedly chattering to the adults about taking the train for the first time and going to see the ocean, she couldn’t help but turn her head away.

As the train stopped, I stepped outside without hesitation. Since it was a rural station, there weren't many passengers getting off.

Still, Grace, having exited the crowded station in this remote place, looked around briefly in front of the station. The main street of Witheridge had not changed significantly in the past two years. The bus stop was still right where it had been in front of the train station.

"Blackburn, one sheet."

Grace's gaze landed on a chocolate that was placed on the stand as she bought a bus ticket to the village at the roadside convenience store.

It's still here.

It was the chocolate that I unknowingly gifted to the pretty boy I saw for the first time after saving up my errands and being frugal.

When I returned home, I could have bought it again. The reason I still didn't know that taste was because every time I saw that, it reminded me of the boy's face since that day at Abington Beach.


Today, I turned away without the courage to live. Perhaps Grace will never know the taste of that chocolate for her entire life.

I don’t want to know anymore.

That night, the boy died.

Suppressing the surging emotions, I stood by the roadside. I heard the sound of a nurse officer, who was a few steps behind her, buying the same ticket.

I lifted my head, which had been looking down at my toes. A red sunset was descending over the low buildings. It almost looked like blood.

I took a deep breath. As I clenched my fist tightly, the bus ticket crumpled. Grace turned her eyes sideways and secretly glanced at the black sedan parked down the road in the distance.


That man must be watching her right now.

Son of a bitch. But a useful son of a bitch.

The bus arrived. The woman disappeared inside the bus, and McGill followed her in, which Leon observed through the car window.

"Follow me."

Following his instructions, the driver began to drive the car behind the bus. Leon, unable to take his eyes off the bus traveling along the winding country road, fell into deep thought.


Today is a historic day. It will be recorded in the history of the world as the day the stronghold of the Blanchard rebels was captured, and in the history of Leon Winston, it will be marked as the day he permanently conquered the fortress known as Grace Lee.

Leon had reserved a hotel suite nearby in advance. To allow the woman, who had spent two exhausting, cold days, to rest fully. Tonight, he would embrace her while pouring champagne.


The deployment of troops has already been completed. Blackburn village was essentially surrounded.

Some of the soldiers disguised as travelers have completed the reconnaissance of the internal dynamics. The village was filled with a festive atmosphere ahead of Christmas Eve. They were completely off guard.

The military has distributed the description of the woman, indicating that she is a double agent and should not be attacked; upon discovery, she is to be prioritized for protection immediately.


With all preparations complete, only the final step remains before commencing the purge operation.

The betrayal of Grace Lee.


Leon had been anticipating the moment when that woman would fall from grace as a traitor in front of hundreds of comrades.
An enemy, you say. I am no longer a revolutionary.

No, they are not revolutionaries either.

The man's words were right. Without the support of the people, a revolution led by a minority is simply a rebellion.

Oh no, I thought I was an apostle of justice.

I believed the place I dedicated my whole life to was justice, but it was injustice.

As she burst into a smile mixed with tears, the village women approaching her viewed her as a crazy woman.

I endured such numerous trials just to protect these hypocrites. It was utter foolishness.

“This is all for your comrades. Shouldn't we quickly lift the brainwashing and stop the useless sacrifices?”

Yeah, that's true. Everything you said is right.

The view opened up before my eyes. I had finally entered the village square.

As I headed toward the center of the square, the sound of carols became increasingly clear. The excited voices also distinctly resonated in my ears.

In front of the church, in the middle of the square, there stood a towering fir tree. At the top, it was adorned with a large star, and the tree was decorated with colorful ribbons and brightly lit candles. In front of the tree stood a statue of the Virgin Mary holding a newborn baby in her arms.

The people gathered in front of her began to recognize Grace one by one, then hesitated for a moment before starting to whisper among themselves. They had intentionally seen her clearly exposed belly by opening the flaps of her coat.

Among the shocked faces, some sent glares of reproach. On the day commemorating the baby savior born from the Virgin's body, how could they look at the maiden who bore a child out of wedlock with such contempt?

Grace glared at them and raised her fist.

It was the time to atone by condemning.

I pointed at each sinful person with my finger and shouted so that the whole village could hear, no, so that the one who would bring hell could clearly hear it.

"Hypocrites! You, you, you! Everyone in this town is an accomplice!"

The amazement etched on the faces of the hypocrites gradually transformed into hostility and displeasure. Amidst the lingering uncomfortable silence, the sound of hurried footsteps echoed from behind.


As she looked back, the nurse officer following her put the whistle hanging from her neck in her mouth and ran between the secluded buildings. Like waiting for the rider of the apocalypse who is said to come on the Day of Judgment, someone from behind grabbed Grace, who was calmly staring at the spot where the woman had disappeared.

“Grace!”

It was Jimmy.

He was looking down at Grace with a pale, ashen face.

"Ha…."

Seeing that face, I thought I would get angry, but instead, I smiled first. It’s the same face as two years ago.

You haven't changed at all. I've fallen so far apart.

As the sharp sound of the whistle pierced the sky, Jimmy abruptly took Grace to the nearest building, the village hall. She followed quietly. It was all part of the plan.


"Damn it...."
James Blanchard Jr., I wish you good luck. You will experience the pain that I have gone through.

She gazed coldly at the monster disappearing outside the door and looked down at the secret door he had left unlocked.

The resistance was suppressed in an instant.

Leon got out of the car and stood in the middle of the square, twisting his lips into a smile.

"It's incredibly trivial."

In the end, it was all his fault. The more perfectly the operation was prepared, the more trivial the reality would be.

"It was too perfect, even if it was perfect."

He looked around. Soldiers with rifles were herding prisoners, who had their hands raised above their heads, into a military truck. It was like driving a herd of cattle into a barn.


The gaze that moved from the truck was directed towards the church from which smoke was seeping through the broken windows. The church, which was expected to put up quite a persistent resistance, easily fell after a few grenades were thrown in through the worship hall windows.

Leon turned his head towards the sounds of the wounded groaning and the repeated sobbing of a coward.

In front of a building that looked like a village hall on one side of the square, a makeshift barricade had been set up in a haphazard manner. Around it, those who had been arrested after resisting until the end were kneeling or lying face down on the ground with their heads pushed against the barrels of guns.

As the sound of boots leisurely striking the stone floor grew closer, the people raised their heads. In their eyes, the tall man approaching with a whip in hand and a black trench coat billowing in the dark blue shadows appeared to be the harbinger of death.

Leon furrowed his brow as he gazed at those looking up at him with eyes full of fear.

They all seemed like such ordinary country people. I couldn't believe that because of such trivial individuals, his father had died miserably and countless people had suffered for decades.


But now was not the time to be leisurely lost in thought. He pointed at the guys with the riding crop in one hand and asked.

“Where is your commander? I would like to see their face.”

Then, a young man who had been kneeling behind the barricade slowly stood up, gritting his teeth.

"James, Blanchard, Junior."

Leon spread his arms wide and raised his hands, which were clad in black leather gloves, high in admiration. The thug, as if he had just met a star, glared at him with eyes burning with contempt and rage.


"I've always been curious about what you look like."

Finally seeing the guy's face, Leon chuckled.

It seems the author brainwashed that woman's eyes as well.

"Campbell."

As Leon signaled, Campbell took the soldier who was subduing Little Jimmy and brought him forward to face him.

"Ah, speaking of which, I almost forgot to introduce myself. I'm Leon Winston, a captain in the Domestic Intelligence Division of the Western Command, and the father of the child in your fiancée's womb. Ah, is she now my ex-fiancée?"

The moment Leon smiled with a twist of his eyes, Blanchard attempted to spit at him fearlessly about the prisoner. Of course, before achieving his aim, he was kicked by Leon and fell to the stone floor.



“Oh, this welcome is too much. I'm so glad to finally meet you like this, aren't you?”
"Okay...."

Prepared to escape, Grace let out a deep sigh as she stroked her belly, feeling the movements clearly.

"First, let's go together."

It was a night when the full moon rose. The gaze, which had helplessly looked at the invisible end of the river shimmering with silver, gradually became resolute.

The winter riverbank, where the beasts were hibernating and migratory birds had flown south, was quiet. Before long, the sound of gunfire had ceased and only faint carols continued.


While one side was waging war, it seemed that in a village across the river, Christmas Eve services were in full swing. Grace hummed the familiar lyrics praising the Savior to a faint melody.


“Have pity on us and forgive all of our sins….”

The lips that once spoke pious words suddenly contorted.

Sin must be paid for to be forgiven.

And there was one more person who had to pay for their sins.

Leon Winston, now it's your turn to struggle in hell.

If making someone fall in love was the beginning of revenge, then Grace's revenge against that man was completed by making him disappear forever.

And there will be no end to that revenge.

Grace turned the gear without hesitation. The boat surged forward, cutting through the moonlit rippling river with a thunderous noise.

The woman named Grace of God bestowed hell upon all who have sinned.

And then she disappeared.



